chapter 006　　　　　　　　　　Six

2.

On the deck of the boat, which chirped with an incongruously cheerful *pon-pon-pon*, the two sat drying their soaked hair and bodies with hand towels handed to them. The young Western woman in formal attire from earlier now seated herself before them. Her hair was tied up in a Margaret-style chignon, and her slightly thick eyebrows were neatly and strikingly groomed.

“Um… thank you so much for saving us,” Kihachi said, bowing deeply.

“Oh, don’t mention it. But more importantly—why on earth were you swimming in such a place?”

“We had our reasons. We jumped off a train.”

When he insisted, “It’s the truth, ma’am,” she burst into loud laughter. Perhaps drawn by the sound, the Western man who had been speaking with the helmsman stood up and came over, taking a seat beside the woman.

“I’m sorry—I should have introduced myself sooner. My name is Stuart Smith.”

With a warm, friendly smile, Stuart gently took Inako’s hand in his own.

Caught off guard by the sudden gesture, Inako froze stiff. Kihachi quickly stepped between them.

“Forgive her—she’s not used to shaking hands. I’m Sakamoto Kihachi.”

After Stuart shook Kihachi’s hand firmly, Inako snapped out of her daze and hastily bowed.

“My name is Hyakugawa Inako.”

“…Shirako?”

“Inako!”

Stuart scratched his head sheepishly as Inako glared at him, clearly annoyed.

Beside him, the woman giggled brightly. “Oh, come on—*Shirako*? That’s not even close!”

2.

The woman said, “I’m sorry—I should have introduced myself sooner. My name is Stuart Smith.” With a warm, friendly smile, Stuart gently took Inako’s hand in his own. Caught off guard by the sudden gesture, Inako froze stiff. Kihachi quickly stepped between them. “Forgive her—she’s not used to shaking hands. I’m Sakamoto Kihachi.” After Stuart shook Kihachi’s hand firmly, Inako snapped out of her daze and hastily bowed. “My name is Hyakugawa Inako.” “…Shirako?” “Inako!” Stuart scratched his head sheepishly as Inako glared at him, clearly annoyed. Beside him, the woman giggled brightly. “Oh, come on—*Shirako*? That’s not even close!”

“I came over from Canada several years ago as an English teacher,” Stuart explained cheerfully. “I met Miss Saki here in Vancouver. She occasionally helps me with daily errands.”

As Stuart smiled warmly, Kihachi let out a small sneeze. Though it was summer, being soaked to the bone like a drowned rat was still unbearable.

“You’ll catch a cold if you stay like that. Once we reach Hachiman, you can change clothes at my place.”

“Hachiman?” Kihachi and Inako echoed in unison.

“Mr. Stuart, you can’t just take them somewhere without even asking where they’re headed.”

“No need to worry—it’s fine. I happen to have business in Hachiman anyway. This is perfect.”

Talk about perfect timing. “Well then, all settled,” Saki said, pulling out a sake bottle. Ignoring the wide-eyed stares of the astonished group, she unfolded a small, origami-style *sakazuki* made of persimmon-tannin paper and poured amber-colored liquor into it.

“Saki-san, drinking this early in the morning again?”

“Oh, what’s wrong with that? I won’t get drunk and start causing trouble.”

When Saki handed the cup toward Kihachi saying, “This is whisky,” Stuart made a grimace.

“Saki-san, don’t encourage a child to drink alcohol.”

“It’s not like it’s legally prohibited or anything.”

Just to smell it, Kihachi brought the cup to his nose. But the intense smoky reek and sharp, stinging aroma made him cough violently. Next to him, Inako panicked. “Are you okay?”

2.

Still coughing, Kihachi mischievously passed the *sakazuki* to Inako, saying, “Smell it.” But contrary to his expectation, when Inako took the cup, she didn’t flinch or laugh—instead, she carefully brought it to her nose, her expression utterly serious.  

“This is the first time I’ve had such a liquor. It has a faint woody fragrance…”  

“You’ve got a good nose. This sake has matured slowly in wooden casks over many years.”  

Taking the cup from Inako, Saki downed the whisky in one gulp and groaned with deep satisfaction. Having lost interest in the drink, Kihachi turned his gaze around the boat.  

“…By the way, this boat seems different from a steamship.”  

“It runs on petroleum. Procuring fuel and maintenance are constant challenges.”  

Privately intrigued by the sensation of riding a petroleum-powered vessel for the first time, Kihachi asked, “But why does a teacher own such a boat?”  

Instead of answering with a smile, Stuart merely gave a wry grin. Saki answered in his place:  
“Strictly speaking, he’s a former teacher. He resigned to devote himself fully to Christian missionary work.”  

At the words “Christian missionary,” Inako’s eyes sparkled with interest, while Kihachi’s narrowed with suspicion.  

“This boat is our means of delivering God’s gospel. Normally we travel to Katata or Takashima, but today we were headed to Ishiyama at a friend’s request. Looking back, perhaps it was divine guidance after all.”  

“So you’re gonna twist even a random chance meeting into something holy, huh?”  

“Kihachi-san,” Inako chided gently, but Stuart stopped her with a soft “It’s fine.” Suddenly, he seemed to remember something.  

2.

“Strictly speaking, he’s a former teacher. He resigned to devote himself fully to Christian missionary work.” At the words “Christian missionary,” Inako’s eyes sparkled with interest, while Kihachi’s narrowed with suspicion. “This boat is our means of delivering God’s gospel. Normally we travel to Katata or Takashima, but today we were headed to Ishiyama at a friend’s request. Looking back, perhaps it was divine guidance after all.” “So you’re gonna twist even a random chance meeting into something holy, huh?” “Kihachi-san,” Inako chided gently, but Stuart stopped her with a soft “It’s fine.” Suddenly, he seemed to remember something.

“Oh, my. When we reach Hachiman, we’ll need to get Inako-chan proper footwear.”

Looking down at Inako’s right foot, Kihachi realized her *kiri* wooden clogs must have come off when she fell into the Setagawa River. Inako hastily covered her bare foot with her hand, her eyes following Stuart as he moved toward the helmsman.

“I’ve never met a foreigner before, but his manners are truly admirable.”

“Don’t be fooled. Who knows what he’s plotting beneath that smile?”

“He’s thoughtful and kind, isn’t he?”

Stuart’s quiet consideration made Kihachi feel inadequate, as though he himself had failed to notice the missing footwear.

Inako’s damp hair clung to her cheeks, her entranced gaze fixed on Stuart. Droplets formed at the ends of her strands, trickling down her pale neck and delicate collarbones before vanishing into the hollow of her chest.

Kihachi averted his eyes from Inako and pulled a biscuit from his pocket. It was the last one—already softened by water. He chewed it bitterly.

Like a corseted waist, Lake Biwa has a narrow, constricted section called the *kubi*. North and south basins are divided at this point, and the boat was now passing through the *kubi*, advancing into the vast expanse of the northern basin.

To the west of the lake rose the mountains of Hiei and Hira, while to the east, beyond the flatlands, loomed Mikami-yama. Offshore from the ayame fishing villages, *eri* fences—used to catch young fish—were scattered sparsely across the lake’s surface.

2.

Ahead of the ship’s bow lay Okishima Island floating on the lake, Chōmeiji-yama rising prominently into Lake Biwa, and next to it, Hachiman-yama. The vessel turned its course toward the foot of Hachiman-yama, the farthest point to the right.

The town of Hachiman began when a castle was built upon Hachiman-yama—close to Azuchi, where Oda Nobunaga had his fortress—as a residence for Toyotomi Hidetsugu, with a castle town developed at its base. But after the castle was soon abandoned, the town gradually lost its military character. As the townspeople's mercantile spirit grew stronger, traveling merchants known as *Hachiman shōnin* emerged, joining other merchant groups from Ōmi Province to form the broader class known as *Ōmi merchants*.

These Ōmi merchants operated across the entire country, engaging not only in peddling but also in large-scale trade. So skilled were they that they came to rival the Ise merchants, another nationwide trading group—though this success bred resentment, leading to the mocking epithet: *"Ōmi thieves, Ise beggars."* Even into the Meiji era, some descendants of these Ōmi merchants adapted their methods and continued to thrive widely in cities like Osaka and Tokyo. In Hachiman itself, the main residences of such merchant families lined the streets.

When Kihachi and Inako arrived at Stuart-san’s home, they were overwhelmed by the three-story Western-style house.

Its walls were coated with stucco, lined with unusually large glass windows. The roof rose high in a hood-like shape, standing out unmistakably among the surrounding traditional townhouses, defiantly foreign in appearance.

Once inside, they were led to separate rooms to change clothes.

"These are clothes I wore when I was a teenager, but I'm glad I kept them,"

2.

They continued to thrive widely in cities like Osaka and Tokyo. In Hachiman itself, the main residences of such merchant families lined the streets. When Kihachi and Inako arrived at Stuart-san’s home, they were overwhelmed by the three-story Western-style house. Its walls were coated with stucco, lined with unusually large glass windows. The roof rose high in a hood-like shape, standing out unmistakably among the surrounding traditional townhouses—defiantly foreign in appearance.

Once inside, they were led to separate rooms to change clothes.  
“These are clothes I wore when I was a teenager, but I'm glad I kept them,” said Stuart-san.

Kihachi slipped into Stuart-san’s white shirt, then tightened the belt around the slightly oversized trousers, folding up the hems. As he grimaced at the awkward fit between his legs, the door opened, and Inako peeked in—just her head.

Yet for some reason, she didn’t enter, instead fidgeting shyly, mumbling something inaudible.

From beyond the door, Saki-san’s voice urged, “Come on, quickly!”—and with a push from behind, Inako tumbled into the room.

Sunlight streaming through the window illuminated her white blouse. She stumbled, spun once on the spot, and her long white skirt flared outward like an opening parasol, fluttering gently as her slender feet came briefly into view. Her hair swayed, revealing a pale neck that flushed crimson. When the spin finally ended, Inako clutched her skirt tightly, her face on the verge of tears.

In that very moment, time truly seemed to slow—flowing with deliberate slowness.

“This is my first time wearing Western clothes… Do I look strange?”

“…Like a *teru teru bōzu*?”

Before the words had fully left his mouth, Inako lashed out, kicking him sharply in the shin.

“Can’t you say something more thoughtful?!” she snapped, baring her teeth at Kihachi’s pained groan.

Stuart-san, observing the exchange from nearby, wore a warm, affable smile.

“You look wonderful—very becoming. Quite lovely.”

“Lo—” Inako stammered, instantly wilting into shyness.

Stuart-san reached for a rectangular box resting on a nearby shelf. Opening the lid, he extended a bellows-style tube, its attached lens glinting in the light.

“It’s a Kodak camera.”

Kihachi instinctively rushed forward, peering closely at the portable camera made by America’s Kodak Company.

---

2.

Before the words had fully left his mouth, Inako lashed out, kicking him sharply in the shin. “Can’t you say something more thoughtful?!” she snapped, baring her teeth at Kihachi’s pained groan. Stuart-san, observing the exchange from nearby, wore a warm, affable smile. “You look wonderful—very becoming. Quite lovely.”  
“L-Lovely?” Inako stammered, instantly wilting into shyness.

Stuart-san reached for a rectangular box resting on a nearby shelf. Opening the lid, he extended a bellows-style tube, its attached lens glinting in the light.  
“It’s a Kodak camera.”  
Kihachi instinctively rushed forward, peering closely at the portable camera made by America’s Kodak Company.

“Oh, you know about it already? I enjoy taking photographs with this,” said Stuart-san gently, his voice pulling Kihachi back to his senses. Flustered, Kihachi stepped back with an awkward grimace.

“You two, please stand side by side. Let’s take one picture for keepsake.”  
As Stuart-san raised the camera into position, Inako let out a startled shriek—“Eeep!”—and ducked behind Kihachi’s back. A soft, unfamiliar scent of perfume drifted by. Her voice trembled slightly as she asked, “W-What’re you doing?!”

“They say having your photo taken steals your soul…”  

*Just how far back in time does this girl think she is?*

“Don’t be ridiculous! If that were true, the whole world’d be full of corpses by now!”

Still, Inako refused adamantly. With no choice, they reluctantly agreed to put the camera away. Seeing this, Saki clapped her hands together cheerfully.

“Well then, let’s have lunch! You two must be hungry. The rice should’ve finished cooking just about now.”

“No, really, that won’t be necessary. We’ll be leaving soon anyway—”

“What are you talking about?” Saki cut in, giving Kihachi’s shoulders a firm double pat.  
“Meals are more fun when shared! And besides, it’ll take time for your clothes to dry, right?”

In the end, the pair gave in and found themselves seated side by side at the living room table. As Saki set down dishes—simmered small ayu fish, dried tofu from Mount Kōya—Inako suddenly tugged at Kihachi’s sleeve.

“Kihachi-san… look! Something’s wrong—the konjac is red!”

On the little dish sat konjac dyed a vivid crimson, like the red-armored troops of Ii or Sanada.

“Around here, konjac is always red. It’s colored, sure, but the taste’s no different from regular konjac.”

“But why make it that color?”

2.

“Fun when shared! And besides, it’ll take time for your clothes to dry, right?” In the end, the pair gave in and found themselves seated side by side at the living room table. As Saki set down dishes—simmered small ayu fish, dried tofu from Mount Kōya—Inako suddenly tugged at Kihachi’s sleeve. “Kihachi-san… look! Something’s wrong—the konjac is red!”

On the little dish sat konjac dyed a vivid crimson, like the red-armored troops of Ii or Sanada.

“Around here, konjac is always red. It’s colored, sure, but the taste’s no different from regular konjac.”

“But why make it that color?”

“I wouldn’t know,” Kihachi replied.

Stuart-san, watching their exchange, shook his shoulders with laughter. Inako, head bowed, fidgeted as she brushed hair from her cheek—her exposed ear tinged slightly red.

Saki poked her head out from the door leading to the kitchen. “Stuart-san, you’ve been leaving dishes piled up in the sink again, haven’t you?”

Stuart scratched his cheek sheepishly.

“And you left your shirt scattered in the bedroom. Don’t you need to press it?”

“Sorry, I wasn’t thinking.”

“And the cleaning too. While I was away just a moment, the whole house got dusty.”

“Saki-san, we can tidy up later—let’s eat first.”

“I’m coming right away!” With that, Saki slammed the door shut and disappeared into the kitchen.

When Inako asked, “Are they always like this?”, Stuart pressed a hand to his forehead.

“When I met her in Vancouver, she was such a demure woman…”

“Does Saki-san dress so well because she’s from a noble family or something?”

“No, she’s a businesswoman. She earns more than I ever could.”

As Saki returned triumphantly, she placed a bottle of whiskey on the table.

“Now then—let’s drink!”

During the meal, Stuart and Saki peppered Kihachi and Inako with questions about themselves, so they explained they’d fallen into Lake Biwa while playing around on the train en route to meet an acquaintance in Hachiman-machi.

“If you’re meeting someone around here, who might that be?”

2.

Kihachi was about to utter the name of Santakurō when a bright, lively voice called out from the entrance hall: “Teacher!”

“Hm? Who could that be?” Stuart turned toward the entrance—but did not return. After a long pause, a boy about Kihachi’s age timidly stepped into the room, muttering, “Sorry to intrude.”

“Saki-san. Mr. Stuart? He just went off toward the church.”

“Church?” Saki tilted her head, puzzled.

The boy scratched his head, looking embarrassed. “Some folks who’ve been studying the Bible over there came asking questions—and just took Mr. Stuart off with them.”

“Oh, honestly,” Saki said, downing a gulp of whiskey before standing up. “That’s just like him—too kind for his own good. I’m heading over to the church now. You’re welcome to come along, if you’d like.”

*No way,* Kihachi thought. Not only might Roku or Jinbei’emon show up at any moment, but who in their right mind would willingly walk into a church to hear some dubious sermon about the Bible?

“Hey, Inako-chan—do you happen to be interested in Christianity?”

Saki had asked the very last person she should have. Kihachi shot her a pleading look, but, as expected, Inako’s eyes lit up at the mention of Christianity.

“If it’s about God, I’m in,” Inako replied at once. *This girl will eat anything,* Kihachi thought bitterly.

With the decision settled, they headed outside. At the entrance, Inako sat on the bench, struggling with her first pair of lace-up shoes. When she finally managed to put them on, she happily tapped her heels together.

New Terms Found:  
None.

Updated Glossary:  
None.

“I’ve always dreamed of dressing like a modern, stylish lady. Are you sure I can really have these?”  

Saki, already outside the entrance, laughed and said, “Of course!”  

“I got them from the Western shoe shop in Hachiman Town—they had some old pairs they weren’t using anymore. It’s perfect.”  

As Inako happily stamped her feet to test the shoes, Kihachi watched her closely. “What? Is something weird?” Inako tilted her head slightly. He’d meant to say something else, but decided against it. If he said anything foolish and she kicked him with those new Western shoes, he feared his bones might actually shatter.  

The church they headed to in Hachiman Town was still under construction, scheduled to be completed next month.  

Though still being built, the interior was nearly finished. The small, triangular-roofed church strangely fit into the landscape of Hachiman Town. Inside, a cross hung on the wall, and before the altar opposite it, long benches were evenly arranged. Unlike the main hall of a temple, where incense scented the air, here the only fragrance was that of fresh timber. Voices and even small sounds echoed sharply beneath the high ceiling.  

Stuart-san sat at the end of one of the benches, surrounded by young people. When Saki explained their situation, he immediately agreed to improvise a mock Sunday service for Kihachi and Inako.  

“This is my first time doing anything like this,” Inako murmured nervously as she sat down.  

From behind, Stuart placed a hand gently on her shoulder.  

“Inako-chan, do you like singing?”  

“M-me? I—I like listening to songs…”  

“We’ll all sing together later, so look forward to it.”  

2.

Stuart-san winked at Inako before striding confidently toward the altar.

“Kihachi-san, are you nervous too?”

Turning at her sudden question, he saw that Inako had said, “Your face is all stiff.”

He hadn’t thought himself the type to get so tense, but now that she mentioned it, his body felt restless, his head strangely heavy.

Stuart stood at the altar as pastor, and the service began.

He read selected passages from the Bible, explaining God’s teachings, pausing frequently for everyone to recite prayers together. The whole event flowed less like a formal ceremony and more like a Bible study session. Stuart played the organ, and they sang several hymns in chorus. Inako kept missing the pitch, yet each time she sang with obvious delight.

When the service ended, Inako was the first to rush over to Stuart as he tidied up.

“So Christianity… doesn’t involve strict ascetic practices or anything?”

“It depends on the denomination,” Stuart replied, “but we place our emphasis solely on faith and Scripture. No amount of austerity or penance can bring you closer to God. Salvation comes only through trusting in God and surrendering yourself to Him.”

Privately surprised by how closely this resembled the doctrines of Zenshoku-ji, Kihachi glanced sideways—only to find Inako looking back at him, eyes bright with excitement.

“That’s right! It’s so similar. Even though it’s a completely different religion—it’s amazing.”

“Well then,” Inako pressed, leaning forward intently, “does Christianity have a place like Paradise?”

Kihachi shivered again at the intensity in her voice.

“Yes,” Stuart answered. “We call it Heaven, or sometimes the Kingdom of God.”

“What’s it like there?”  

2.

“Do you know what Paradise is like, Inako-chan?”

“Um… I vaguely think it’s a world where you can meet your deceased family, and live happily without worries or the suffering of illness.”

“Then the Kingdom of God is just such a place.”

Glancing sideways at Inako’s bright, animated expression, Kihachi muttered under his breath, “Man, that’s awfully convenient.”

“Still,” he added, “you play the organ really well, Stuart-san.”

“There was a piano at my home in Canada. Whenever I had free time, I would play it over and over.”

“Why don’t you try playing something too, Inako-chan?” Stuart encouraged.

Hesitant but curious, Inako stepped forward and stood before the organ.

“Hey, Inago, isn’t that enough already?” Kihachi interjected.

“Just bear with it—this is a rare chance. Let me play just a little.”

Without even turning to look at him, she pressed down on the keys, and an off-key note rang out through the church.

Kihachi couldn’t help but burst into laughter—and immediately earned a sharp glare from Inako. At once, Stuart stepped beside her, placing his hand gently atop the keyboard. “Put your fingers on the same keys as mine. Let’s play together.”

While Kihachi looked on, bewildered, Inako timidly placed her fingers over his.

They played “The ABC Song.” Matching Stuart’s steady movements, Inako gradually pressed each key. It was slow and halting, but when they finished, her face lit up. “Wow, this is fun!”

“You’re a natural teacher. Stuart-san, your way of teaching is incredibly clear.”

“Well, this man can do anything skillfully,” Kihachi grumbled.

2.

Saki, who had just been chatting with the young people, was now standing beside Kihachi without anyone noticing.

“You know, Stuart-san designed his house himself.”

“Really?” Inako asked, surprised, and Stuart smiled gently, his eyes crinkling at the corners.

“I studied architecture at university. Now that I’ve left my teaching post, I run an architectural practice.”

“It’s such a beautiful house. And there are so many windows—every room is bright.”

“You observe well. Inako-chan always shows interest in everything and strives to learn.”

Stuart stroked his chin and chuckled. “Inako-chan is like koya-dōfu.”

“Koya-dōfu?”

“Yes—just like koya-dōfu soaking up water, she absorbs everything she learns.”

When Kihachi teased, “Koya-dōfu-chan,” Inako turned her profile stiffly away, nose in the air.

“Well, I think that’s a far better name than calling me ‘Inago.’”

Then Stuart turned to Kihachi. “You, on the other hand, are ice cream.”

Kihachi looked puzzled, so Inako chimed in, “It’s not that you’re cold like ice, is it?”—and everyone burst into laughter. Mortified at being made the butt of the joke, Kihachi clamped his lips shut and fell silent.

Stuart and Inako approached the organ again and began to play, just as before.

The tones bounced against the eardrums, failing to resonate in the chest. Kihachi felt dizzy, a nausea like indigestion rising within him, yet he kept his eyes fixed on Inako’s back as she played the organ.

---

2.

“Kihachi,” she said, turning to him, “you, on the other hand, are ice cream.” Kihachi looked puzzled, so Inako chimed in, “It’s not that you’re cold like ice, is it?”—and everyone burst into laughter. Mortified at being made the butt of the joke, Kihachi clamped his lips shut and fell silent. Stuart and Inako approached the organ again and began to play, just as before. The tones bounced against the eardrums, failing to resonate in the chest. Kihachi felt dizzy, a nausea like indigestion rising within him, yet he kept his eyes fixed on Inako’s back as she played the organ.

Watching her slender, softly feminine back sway with cheerful ease—so clearly unconnected to him—his heartburn turned to restless agitation, and he felt an unbearable sense of not belonging, as though he had no right to be there.

He waited until the long stretch of music finally came to an end, then stepped forward.

“Excuse me… but we should be going soon. We have matters to attend to.”

Stuart stepped away from Inako. “My apologies,” he said, lowering the corners of his eyes. “Come to think of it, where were you two headed next? Who were you planning to meet?”

“Ah, someone named Santakurō.”

Conversation ceased. The air grew still. For some reason, everyone stared wide-eyed.

“…Sorry—I beg your pardon. Could you say that again?”

“Santakurō. He’s apparently a peculiar fellow who gives presents to children for free during winter.”

As soon as he finished speaking, everyone burst out laughing all at once. Bewildered, Kihachi’s eyes darted about helplessly.

“That’s Santa Claus,” Saki said gently, her expression almost pitying. “Every year at Christmas, there’s a legend about an old man called Santa Claus who walks around giving gifts to children. In the West, adults follow this tradition by giving presents to children. Unfortunately… there’s no real person named Santakurō.”

Someone laughed. “How innocent—to actually believe in Santa.” Heat rushed through Kihachi’s entire body.

---

2.

“Santakurō. He’s apparently a peculiar fellow who gives presents to children for free during winter.” As soon as he finished speaking, everyone burst out laughing all at once. Bewildered, Kihachi’s eyes darted about helplessly. “That’s Santa Claus,” Saki said gently, her expression almost pitying. “Every year at Christmas, there’s a legend about an old man called Santa Claus who walks around giving gifts to children. In the West, adults follow this tradition by giving presents to children. Unfortunately… there’s no real person named Santakurō.” Someone laughed. “How innocent—to actually believe in Santa.” Heat rushed through Kihachi’s entire body.

He didn’t understand what had just happened. After a while, he finally realized he had been harboring an incredible misunderstanding for several years. Of course—he only needed to think for a moment to see it.

In his mind, Seiroku was pointing at him and rolling with laughter.

The heavy weight of disappointment and reluctant understanding, like the moment a magic trick is revealed, settled over him. Kihachi slumped lifelessly onto the bench. Saki approached with a serious expression, and her warm hand came to rest on his forehead.

“No wonder. I thought you seemed off—your fever’s back.”

　　　　　　　　　　＊

After Kihachi and Inako fell into the Setagawa River, Roku hurried to the scene, but aside from hearing from a fisherman that they had been rescued by a boat resembling a steamship, he found no further clues about their whereabouts.

The next day, Roku visited Fushimi and apologized to Jinbei’emon for his own mishandling of the situation.

“No, Roku, you’re not to blame. This failure lies with me as well.”

Jinbei’emon deepened the wrinkles on his face as he spoke. Roku hesitated, then said, “If I may say so…”

“I don’t know if I should be meddling, but… there’s still time before the wedding. Couldn’t we let Inako have her freedom until then?”

Jinbei’emon exhaled a forceful stream of cigarette smoke, deepening his wrinkles even further.

“…Are you certain you’re not feeling some strange sympathy for Inako?”

Before Roku could continue—“But that Yōsuke fellow is certainly suspicious…”—Jinbei’emon cut him off.

2.

“Given your promise to marry Noriko, we absolutely need you to act in the interest of Hyakugawa. The future of Hyakugawa Shuzō hinges on Dr. Paikaru’s marriage to Inako. If the brewery collapses, our business relationship with Riku Tsuneichi Shōten, our rice supplier, will also fall apart.”

Jinbei’emon twisted his mouth as he spoke. “Come now—surely you don’t want to hand Noriko over to another man?”

Roku remained silent, lips tightly sealed. The conversation ended there. As he left Jinbei’emon’s room and walked down the corridor, Yōsuke emerged from the parlor with Noriko. “Oh, finished talking?” he said, approaching.

“I was enjoying Noriko-san’s tea until the conversation ended. Hope I didn’t overstep.”

Roku glanced briefly at Noriko, who was watching him with an appraising look. He replied simply, “No.”

“Good. …By the way, I heard we let those two slip away again yesterday.”

As they passed each other, Yōsuke whispered it into his ear.

When Roku turned his head toward him, Yōsuke placed a hand on his shoulder. “Don’t worry. Inako will return of her own will sooner or later. She surely will, yes?”

Before Roku could speak, Yōsuke briskly walked off toward Jinbei’emon’s room. Puzzled, Roku bowed slightly to Noriko and turned to leave, but she called out, “Roku-san.”

“You look awfully gloomy. Something wrong? A quiet Roku is… strangely unsettling.”

“Do you have some illness that kills you if you don’t spew poison? …Ah, never mind.”

2.

“Slip away again yesterday.” As they passed each other, Yōsuke whispered it into his ear. When Roku turned his head toward him, Yōsuke placed a hand on his shoulder. “Don’t worry. Inako will return of her own will sooner or later. She surely will, yes?” Before Roku could speak, Yōsuke briskly walked off toward Jinbei’emon’s room. Puzzled, Roku bowed slightly to Noriko and turned to leave, but she called out, “Roku-san.”  
“You look awfully gloomy. Something wrong? A quiet Roku is… strangely unsettling.”  
“Do you have some illness that kills you if you don’t spew poison? …Ah, never mind.”  

Looking Noriko in the eye, Roku bitterly said, “I met the boy who took Inako away.”  
“…He’s Seiroku’s younger brother.”  

Noriko showed no change in expression, merely continued gazing up at Roku.  

“Did you know that Kihachi took Inako? Is that why you’re so calm?”  

“Our calmness comes from knowing that Inako is safe.”  

Roku averted his face from her emotionless eyes and turned toward the entrance.  

“Roku-san,” Noriko called again from behind.  

“Are you troubled by the fact that I was talking with Yōsuke-san?”  

Without turning around, Roku carefully chose his words.  
“…Not at all. Who you speak with is entirely your freedom.”  

He fled out the front door, making an excuse to escape. Outside, a sudden downpour had begun. A maid offered him an umbrella, but Roku firmly refused and walked off into the rain.  

Inhaling the damp, rain-soaked scent of his clothes grown heavy with warm moisture, Roku murmured, “Stuart-sensei.”  
“Could this turn of events be the will of the Lord?”  

　　　　　　　　　　＊  

Awakening to the clammy discomfort of a yukata soaked with sweat, Kihachi lay in bed basking in the abundant morning sunlight streaming through the large window when a smaller hand than Saki’s was placed gently on his forehead.  

“Your fever’s gone down—it seems you’re fine now.”  

Inako smiled at his bedside. She had changed out of Western clothes and was once again wearing her usual dark blue *kasuri* kimono with a white *shirasuri* pattern. Still lying on his side, Kihachi croaked, “What a bright morning. The sun pours right in.”  

2.

“This room is called the sunroom. It’s nice and warm—really cozy.”

The walls of the room were almost entirely glass windows, making the interior far brighter than any traditional Japanese house. The surrounding townhouses were low, allowing a clear view of Mikami-yama rising over the plain.

“Any appetite? Tell me if you want anything.”

*Want.* The cool, pleasant sensation of that hand moments ago—“Hand,” he blurted out unintentionally.

Inako tilted her head in confusion. Kihachi quickly corrected himself: “No—water.” His head still didn’t feel quite right.

He took the teacup from Inako and drained the water, finally feeling his thoughts clear.

“I ended up staying overnight because of me. I’ve troubled Mr. Stuart too much.”

“If it’s a cold, you can’t help it. Might’ve been from jumping into Lake Biwa and getting soaked.”

“Then why aren’t *you* sick…? Ah, right—fools don’t catch colds—”

“You seem lively enough—that’s what matters,” Inako said, leaning her elbows on her stomach as Kihachi groaned.

“And for your information, I *have* caught a cold before, thank you very much.”

She puffed out her flat chest proudly. Did she really have to sound so smug about it?

“Feels nostalgic… Back then, my sister took care of me day and night.”

“Noriko-san, was it? That sister of yours—seemed strict, but really kind-hearted.”

“Of course. She’s virtuous enough to receive letters from Akubi Ōmyōjin—I’m proud to call her my sister.”

2.

“That day we first met, you said, ‘I’ll get a letter from Akubi-sama,’” Inako murmured. Suddenly, it felt like that event belonged to a distant past, and she found herself lost in quiet reflection—when all at once, “Ah,” Inako said, pulling out a newspaper.

“Read this—there’s something about us in here.”

When she snatched up the paper, there it was: an article titled *A Double Suicide Attempt by a Man and Woman on the Setagawa River*. It described everything in detail—from their leap into the water to their rescue by a Western-style boat—and apparently, a reporter who happened to be strolling along the riverbank had witnessed the entire incident. Kihachi folded the newspaper and gave Inako a weak smile.

“Might as well vanish completely and make a nukemairi pilgrimage to Ise.”

Inako let out a small, startled “Huh?”

“You remember—we talked about checking whether you can really see Mount Fuji from Ise. You mentioned it back at Mii-dera.”

In truth, Santakurō-san had never existed, nor had Seiroku. With the deadline—the day of Inako’s wedding ceremony—now just two days away, and every lead in the *Denki Mokuroku* having completely dried up, there was little else he could do for her anymore.

“Or if you’d rather, we could beg money from someone and head to Kantō. There, you could feast your eyes on Mount Fuji until you’re sick of it—”

“Kihachi-san, your clothes will go in that basket over there.”

With a gentle smile, Inako stepped out of the room. Kihachi remained frozen, half-smiling, as the sunroom gradually dimmed. Glancing outside, he saw thick clouds had gathered, veiling the sun.

After changing clothes and descending the stairs, he entered the living room to find Inako and Stuart-san chatting across the table. Noticing Kihachi, Stuart-san turned to him with a warm, friendly grin.

2.

“Good morning, Kihachi-kun. Feeling better now?”

Kihachi curtly replied, “I’m fine,” and sat down across from Inako. After the three of them finished a simple breakfast, Stuart-san said, “I’ve got something rare,” and disappeared into the kitchen.

“Come to think of it, where’s Saki-san?”

“She mentioned having relatives nearby, so she went home last night.”

Their conversation ended there. The ticking of the wall clock echoed with a sharp *kotchii* through the spacious room. As the overcast sky outside continued to spread, the living room grew increasingly dim.

“I’ve kept you waiting. Here’s coffee.”

Before long, Stuart-san emerged from the back carrying a tray, placing before them the offered drink. Both stared intently at the liquid in their cups. Dark fluid filled the teacups, releasing an aroma like scorched beans.

It looked no different from India ink—was this really something a human being could drink?

“Don’t be afraid. Taste it.”

Insulted by being treated like a child, Kihachi thought, *Fine, I’ll drink it then*, and gulped it down in one go.

At that instant, a bomb of concentrated bitterness and astringency exploded in his mouth.

Overwhelmed by a flavor unlike anything he’d ever experienced, he nearly choked—but clenched every muscle in his face and somehow managed to swallow. Glancing sideways at Inako, he saw her grimace exactly as expected, twisting her face as she groaned, “Bitter! I want sugar.”

2.

It was comforting to have Inako speak for him, voicing his own feelings. Stuart-san smiled, slowly raised his teacup to his lips, and narrowed his eyes as if savoring the taste.

"When you become an adult, you’ll come to understand this flavor."

"No way. Right, Kihachi-san? You think it’s bitter too, don’t you?"

"No—actually, I get it. This bitterness is good."

Inako shot Kihachi a skeptical look, watching him desperately suppress the grimace threatening to contort his face from the bitter taste.

A knock came at the front door, followed by a voice from outside: “Good morning.”

Stuart-san went to answer it—it seemed another visitor had arrived.

As soon as Stuart-san turned away, Inako immediately lost interest in Kihachi and gazed after his retreating back with wistful eyes.

Kihachi set his teacup down on the table. His stomach, unaccustomed to the bitterness, felt slightly unsettled. Silence stretched between them. Restlessly, Inako traced the rim of her cup with her finger.

"About that *Denki Mokuroku*... I’m thinking we should go back again, either to Ōtsu or Hōrai Butsugu-ten."

When Kihachi said this, Inako didn’t lift her head. She simply stopped tracing the rim.

"Forget it. It’s fine."

"...What did you say?"

"It’s fine already. Anyway, we don’t even know if the catalog still exists. Maybe it was thrown out long ago—or lost somewhere—"

"So you’re saying we should just give up?" he cut in sharply.

"If we do nothing, in two days’ time I’ll be married off to that Dr. Paikaru."

"But… I can’t keep causing my family more trouble just because of my selfishness."

2.

“Again? Back to Ōtsu or Hōrai Butsugu-ten?” When Kihachi said this, Inako didn’t lift her head. She simply stopped tracing the rim. “Forget it. It’s fine.”  
“…What did you say?”  
“It’s fine already. Anyway, we don’t even know if the catalog still exists. Maybe it was thrown out long ago—or lost somewhere—”  
“So you’re saying we should just give up?” he cut in sharply.  
“If we do nothing, in two days’ time I’ll be married off to that Dr. Paikaru.”  
“But… I can’t keep causing my family more trouble just because of my selfishness.”

Slightly hesitant, Inako spoke haltingly. Kihachi felt a sudden headache coming on. *Again with this?*

Inako remained silent, head bowed. Before long, the sky cleared, and the fierce summer sunlight poured through the window.

“Well then, shall we just go back like this?”

“…Yeah. I wanted to hear a bit more about Christianity, though.”

Hearing Inako speak shyly, Kihachi felt as though his heart had been seared.

“It’s not Christianity you want to hear about—you just want to talk to Stuart-san.”

Whether she noticed the sarcasm or not, Inako gave a wry smile. “Well… maybe a little.”

“Look. I haven’t even thanked him properly for the shoes. At least before we leave, I should try to help with something.”

Her words carried a forced tone, and Kihachi’s grip tightened around his teacup.

“People who believe in that dubious nonsense—virgins giving birth, men walking on water, the dead rising—it’s impossible to trust them.”

“Maybe it sounds like a tall tale, but there were plenty of things that could help us, too.”

“That’s exactly why you almost got tricked by that fake *haibei* at Inariyama.”

“…Believing is what I do best.”

“You mean gullibility.”

Inako had been looking confused—until, for the first time, anger flickered across her face.

“You distrust people too much, Kihachi-san. Why don’t you try being more open-hearted, like Stuart-san?”

2.

A forced tone, and Kihachi’s grip tightened around his teacup. “People who believe in that dubious nonsense—virgins giving birth, men walking on water, the dead rising—it’s impossible to trust them.”  
“Maybe it sounds like a tall tale, but there were plenty of things that could help us, too.”  
“That’s exactly why you almost got tricked by that fake *haibei* at Inariyama.”  
“…Believing is what I do best.”  
“You mean gullibility.”  

Inako had been looking confused—until, for the first time, anger flickered across her face.  
“You distrust people too much, Kihachi-san. Why don’t you try being more open-hearted, like Stuart-san?”  

“That foreigner with his fake smile? Fine, then let me ask you this—since you believe in Buddhism, Christianity, and Japan’s gods alike, where do you think you’re going when you die? Heaven? Or Paradise?”  

“I’ll go wherever I want. Or else, whichever god wants me will let me in somewhere.”  

“…How carefree you are. You can just go on believing that teacher’s fishy stories until you’re satisfied.”  

Inako’s eyes sharpened as she stood up from her chair.  
“How can you speak so disrespectfully about someone who helped us? You’re always suspicious of everything—you’re just pitiful.”  

Kihachi, his anger now at its peak, also rose and slammed the table.  
“What right do you have to say anything? You still don’t understand the first thing about this world—and yet I brought you this far!”  

“But it was *you*, Kihachi-san, who dragged me out of the brewery without even listening to what I had to say!”  

“Would you rather I’d just left you there? You’re the one who turned down marriage yourself!”  

“What—” Inako stammered.  

“You can’t do a single thing without relying on others!”  

A beat of silence. Then a single drop fell from Inako’s wide-open eyes, splashing into her teacup.  

“True, I may be utterly useless, good for nothing but depending on people. But… what’s wrong with being grateful to those who’ve helped me? What’s wrong with wanting to learn things I don’t yet know? Didn’t *you*, Kihachi-san, study electricity the same way?”  

2.

“Drop it already—like I’d ever let them shut down the brewery without even listening to what I had to say!”  
“Would you rather I’d just left you there? You’re the one who turned down marriage yourself!”  
“What—” Inako stammered. “You can’t do a single thing without relying on others!”  

A beat of silence. Then a single drop fell from Inako’s wide-open eyes, splashing into her teacup. “True, I may be utterly useless, good for nothing but depending on people. But… what’s wrong with being grateful to those who’ve helped me? What’s wrong with wanting to learn things I don’t yet know? Didn’t *you*, Kihachi-san, study electricity the same way?”  

The droplet swelled into a downpour, raining heavily onto the tabletop. Kihachi finally realized the foolishness of his words, and the murky frustration spreading through his body quietly dispersed like mist. But it was already too late.  

“So this is how you see things—twisted and bitter, thinking you’re all grown-up? Why can’t you just be honest? Why can’t you, even if it’s just flattery, say kind words like Stuart-san does?”  

Each word from Inako pierced Kihachi’s chest like an invisible blade.  

“That man, even if he *is* a fraud, is still more of a decent human being than you, Kihachi-san, who does nothing but spew venom!”  

Before anyone could stop her, Inako burst into sobs and stormed out of the room. Kihachi collapsed heavily into his chair and listlessly brought to his lips the cold coffee left in his teacup.  

It was bitter—so bitter he couldn’t taste anything else.  

“Just now, I saw Inako-chan run outside. Did something happen?”  

The moment Kihachi saw Stuart’s face returning to the living room, blood rushed to his head. He shot up from his chair and grabbed Stuart by both lapels.  

“What the hell did you say to Inago behind my back?!”  

“…What do you mean, ‘say’?”  

“She’s the type to believe anything people tell her! What lies did you take advantage of and feed her?!”  

Stuart gazed down at the enraged Kihachi, his demeanor utterly calm.  

2.

"Just now, I saw Inako-chan run outside. Did something happen?" The moment Kihachi saw Stuart’s face reappear in the living room, blood rushed to his head. He sprang up from his chair and seized Stuart by both lapels. "What the hell did you say to Inago behind my back?!"  
"...What do you mean, 'say'?"  
"She's the kind who believes anything people tell her! What lies did you take advantage of and feed her?!"  
Stuart gazed down at the enraged Kihachi, utterly calm.  

"That you were trying to persuade her to get married. Spouting some dubious divine nonsense... She can be saved by the *Denki Mokuroku*. Not by some invisible god—but by human hands."  

Stuart’s eyes widened slightly—then quickly returned to their usual composure.  

"And if I *was* persuading her—what would you do? Hit me? Knock me down?"  

His tone carried a quiet, solemn rebuke, so stern that Kihachi fell silent.  

"If you want to hit me, go ahead—don’t hold back. But only if it’ll truly ease your mind."  

Kihachi released his grip on Stuart’s collar. Stuart gestured calmly toward the chair.  

"Sit down, for now. Unless you truly believe you bear no responsibility for Inako-chan’s tears—then by all means, remain standing."  

Stuart’s manner held the unyielding authority befitting a former teacher. As he smoothed his lapels and sat, his usual smile was nowhere to be seen.  

Kihachi knew only one way to endure the suffocating pressure churning in his gut.  

He obediently took his seat directly across from Stuart—and bowed deeply.  

"I’m sorry. That was extremely disrespectful of me."  

Timidly raising his head, he saw Stuart’s familiar, gentle smile return.  

"Very well. By the way—you mentioned the *Denki Mokuroku* earlier?"  
"...? Yes."  
"So it *was* you. No wonder you reminded me of Seiroku-kun."  

　　　　　　　　　　＊  

2.

Inako walked aimlessly through the town, sniffling as she went. A woman with short hair like hers was bound to draw attention in this place—she could feel curious eyes on her. Yet just ahead appeared someone even more conspicuous.

“Oh, Inako-chan. Good morning!”

Saki waved cheerfully, dressed in Western clothes, holding a parasol, and carrying a large basket in one hand.

“Good morning, Saki-san. Are you going out somewhere?”

“It’s such a lovely day—I thought I’d invite Stuart-san along. He hasn’t had any work lately, so he’s probably bored.”

Suddenly, Saki narrowed her eyes and leaned in close. She must have noticed the traces of tears; her expression softened knowingly. “...Yeah. Today, I’m definitely going out with *you*, Inako-chan.” Without another word, she took Inako’s arm and began walking.

“But… won’t Stuart-san be lonely? Shouldn’t we invite him?”

“No, it’s fine. He’s busy with work today anyway.”

She said this so casually—completely contradicting what she’d just said—and dragged Inako along without mercy.

They arrived at a waterway on the edge of town. At a small landing called Kawato, Saki helped Inako onto a boat moored there, then skillfully pushed off and rowed with practiced ease.

On both banks, reeds taller than a person swayed thick and green. Along the water’s edge, a great egret lumbered heavily forward, while mallards floated serenely. The black diving bird swimming with chicks on its back was a grebe; the “kek-kes, kek-kes” call echoing from within the reeds belonged to the great reed warbler—Saki pointed each one out as they passed.

2.

After passing through the reed-lined waterway, they emerged into a slightly broader lake. This area was a secluded inner lake, ringed by land and islands, and according to Saki, one could travel northward from here directly into Lake Biwa. Several small islets dotted the inner lake, thick with reed clusters, and from willow trees growing on these islets, children in loincloths leapt joyfully into the water.

As they advanced across the inner lake, a tiny island came into view, home to nothing more than a small shrine hall. It was called Bentenjima, dedicated to Benzaiten, and oddly, a single wooden pole extended outward from the island into the lake.

“Beyond Bentenjima, you see that mountain over there? That’s Azuchi-yama. Oda Nobunaga once had his castle on that peak.”

Saki pointed toward the mountain jutting boldly over the water, then sighed wistfully.

“If only it hadn’t burned down—we’d have a view as beautiful as Mont Saint-Michel.”

She secured the oar, sat down in the boat, and opened the lid of a woven basket, proudly pulling out several bottles of liquor. Noticing Inako’s curious gaze, she stroked the intricately woven basket and asked, “This? It’s *minokuchi* work—finely plaited from kuzu vine. Beautiful pattern, isn’t it? Foreigners love them.”

Inako thought the basket itself was lovely—but what truly caught her attention were the bottles nestled inside.

“This one’s vodka, this is Daikokuten brandy, and this is tequila. All my favorites.”

After describing each distilled spirit in detail for Inako, Saki poured whiskey into a small glass and handed it to her without hesitation. Inako brought the glass to her nose, sniffed, and widened her eyes in surprise.

“It doesn’t smell smoky like yesterday’s whiskey at all. It has a sweet scent, like burnt sugar.”

---

2.

“It’s fascinating, isn’t it? The flavor changes depending on the ingredients and how they’re blended. And you’ve got a really sharp nose.”

Inako might have developed a keen sense of smell from back when she frequently visited the sake brewery and was always allowed to sample the brews. When she mentioned this to Saki, Saki nodded emphatically. “So Inako-chan really likes sake breweries, then.”

Inako downed the whiskey in one gulp and flopped onto her back.

Above her, the blue sky held only white clouds. The boat was cool, and the gentle swaying lulled her as the rustling reeds, birdsong, and water lapping against the hull blended into a soft melody.

“Hey, aren’t you with Kihachi-kun today?” Saki asked, sipping from her glass.

“…I don’t know anyone like that. He’s always making fun of me.”

“I wonder why Kihachi-kun teases you so much?”

“Because he hates me, probably.”

“But people don’t bother with someone they truly dislike,” Saki said, chuckling softly.

“Teasing someone means you want their attention.”

When Inako sat up abruptly, Saki was watching her with an amused, knowing smile.

“Have you started hating Kihachi-kun?”

Inako shook her head. “No.”

“The truth is… I didn’t want *him* to hate *me*.”

As she spoke, recalling the morning’s argument, Inako buried her face in her folded knees.

---

2.

Sipping from her glass, she murmured, “I don’t know anyone like that. He’s always making fun of me.”  
“I wonder why Kihachi-kun teases you so much?”  
“Because he hates me, probably.”  
“But people don’t bother with someone they truly dislike,” Saki said, chuckling softly. “Teasing someone means you want their attention.”  

When Inako sat up abruptly, Saki was watching her with an amused, knowing smile.  
“Have you started hating Kihachi-kun?”  
Inako shook her head. “No.”  
“The truth is… I didn’t want *him* to hate *me*.” As she spoke, recalling the morning’s argument, Inako buried her face in her folded knees.  

---  

Behind her closed eyelids, Kihachi’s face appeared. The look on his face when she’d embarrassed herself asking about Santakurō, the expression he wore when suffering from a cold—image after image of Kihachi, hurt because of her, rose one by one before her.  

“It broke my heart to see Kihachi-san suffer any more because of me. I was terrified—what if, by constantly troubling him, he eventually came to hate me too?”  

“And so you pushed Kihachi-kun away, without ever properly talking things through. Unilaterally.”  

Stung by the sharp words, Inako lifted her head. Saki still wore that faint, softened smile, but her eyes were not smiling.  

“Poor excuses and false humility are insults to the person who trusts you.”  

The merciless words made Inako reflexively blurt out, “Well, what else could I have done?”  
“The only thing I’ve ever had going for me is faith. What exactly should I have confidence in?”  

“So faith is your only strength,” Saki replied, laughing humorlessly.  
“But tell me—don’t you, in fact, trust Kihachi-kun at all?”  

It felt as though her heart had been cast into a deep pit. The unexpected words left her trembling inside.  

“You claim you don’t want to hurt anyone—but isn’t it really your *own* heart you’re trying to protect? Living so as not to be disliked by anyone isn’t relying on others’ kindness—it’s just another way of putting yourself first.”  

It was as if she were being shown a mirror reflecting her own ugliness. Inako wanted to cover her ears.  

“You quietly wait, secretly hoping that someone will take pity and come to your rescue the moment you step back with false modesty.”  

2.

Though her heart had been cast into a deep pit, the unexpected words left her trembling inside. “You claim you don’t want to hurt anyone—but isn’t it really your *own* heart you’re trying to protect? Living so as not to be disliked by anyone isn’t relying on others’ kindness—it’s just another way of putting yourself first.” It was as if she were being shown a mirror reflecting her own ugliness. Inako wanted to cover her ears. “You quietly wait, secretly hoping that someone will take pity and come to your rescue the moment you step back with false modesty.”  

No, no. But no matter how much she denied it, those sharp words kept carving deeper, peeling away the layers of her hidden heart.  

“Is it that you’re afraid to rely on people, Inako-chan?”  

Saki softened her expression and looked at her with eyes full of tenderness—eyes just like her mother used to have.  

“…Yes. I’m afraid. Even if I did rely on someone, my family has nothing to give in return.”  

Inako huddled inward, tightly crossing her knees.  

“I… I want to become someone like Stuart-san.”  

“Stuart-san?” Saki asked, puzzled.  

“He’s my ideal. I want to be the kind of person others can rely on—someone who can do things for others.”  

Saki let out a high-pitched laugh. Her cheerful voice rose into the clear blue sky.  

“But Stuart-san himself is always depending on others! From the time he lost his teaching job until he started his current work in architecture, he got by on handouts and favors.”  

As Inako stared in surprise, Saki said, “Let’s move on,” and pushed the boat off with an oar.  

After mooring the boat at Bentenjima, they stepped ashore—and right before them stood a small hall.  

“How nostalgic. Long ago, whenever I visited relatives’ homes, we’d float our boat around here and all eat kashiwa-junjun together. Of all the hot pots I’ve ever eaten, that one was the best.”  

“What’s that pole sticking out into the lake over there?”  

“That’s the diving pole. Local kids use it to test their courage by jumping off.”  

2.

They walked through the precinct, and when they finally reached the base of the diving pole, Saki stepped onto it without hesitation. Though she had been drinking distilled spirits as if bathing in them just moments before, her gait remained perfectly steady as she raised both arms horizontally and advanced along the pole.

“When I was a child, I was too scared to jump off. My brother and I were such cowards—we were always teased by our cousins.”

Saki laughed genuinely, then bounced lightly on the pole to show her confidence.

“When I was around your age now, Inako-chan, I moved with relatives to Vancouver, Canada. I thought maybe changing my environment would cure my timid nature. But even after moving somewhere new, my personality stayed exactly the same. Life in a foreign land was painful—prejudice, poverty, the unfamiliarity of everything. I lived in constant fear, not knowing what purpose I even had.

It was Stuart-san who saved me. Inspired by the overseas missionary movement, he came to Japan as a teacher, and we met at a church in Vancouver where he stopped over. The words he spoke to me that day… it felt as though new seeds had been sown into my parched heart.”

Saki gazed dreamily up at the sky, as if reminiscing about that distant encounter.

“That’s when I made a vow: ‘If he ever finds himself in trouble from now on, I’ll be the one to help him. I’ll earn enough money so I can truly support him.’ Now, I feel like I could leap from even this diving pole.”

Beaming with joy, Saki beckoned to Inako.

“Take a step forward. It’s far more delightful than you imagine.”

2.

Inako stood at the base of the pole, glancing down at her feet. The water’s surface was perhaps twice her height below. When she looked up again—surely to Saki’s surprise—she flashed a confident smile and stepped lightly onto the pole, *ton, ton*, walking with ease until she reached Saki’s side.

“No problem. Yesterday I fell from somewhere even higher.”

Saki’s eyes widened, then she laughed, revealing her white teeth. “Well, when you put it that way…”

“Hey, I really think we’re going to be wonderful friends.”

Perched on the pole, Saki began taking sake bottles from her basket and lining them up.

“Tell me about all the adventures you’ve had so far.”

　　　　　　　　　　＊

“Seiroku-kun was one of my students.”

Stuart-san folded his hands on the table, his cheeks softening with nostalgia.

“That was about ten years ago now. Back then, there was a commercial school in Ōtsu. Seiroku-kun used to crack jokes during class and keep everyone entertained. As a newly arrived English teacher, I found him quite the handful.”

At the sudden mention of his brother’s name, Sakamoto Kihachi remained only half-convinced.

“I’d heard stories about you too, Kihachi-kun, though since it was so long ago, I’d forgotten your name.”

Stuart-san added, “But I do recall—you were deeply fascinated by electricity, weren’t you?”

“The Twentieth Century is the century of electricity,” replied Kihachi, his words abrupt and without context.

Stuart-san let out a wry smile, his eyebrows gently slanting downward.

2.

“A commercial school in Ōtsu. Seiroku-kun used to crack jokes during class and keep everyone entertained. As a newly arrived English teacher, I found him quite the handful.” At the sudden mention of his brother’s name, Sakamoto Kihachi remained only half-convinced. “I’d heard stories about you too, Kihachi-kun, though since it was so long ago, I’d forgotten your name.” Stuart-san added, “But I do recall—you were deeply fascinated by electricity, weren’t you?”  
“The Twentieth Century is the century of electricity,” replied Kihachi, his words abrupt and without context. Stuart-san let out a wry smile, his eyebrows gently slanting downward.

“If electricity advances, people’s lives will improve all the more. What good does it do to believe someone’s tall tales and worship gods? From now on, it won’t be gods that illuminate this country—but the light of electric lamps.”

Stuart-san propped his cheek on one hand and tapped the table rhythmically with his fingers. Soon, he stilled them, folded his hands, and faced Kihachi directly once more.

“Kihachi-kun, do you know why I’m no longer working as a teacher?”

“Because being a pastor or an architect pays better?”

“Actually, I was dismissed by the school.”

At this completely unexpected answer, Kihachi caught his breath.

“When the commercial school relocated, I moved here from Ōtsu. But this place is deeply rooted in traditional religion. Still, I continued sowing the seeds of the new God—and just when I thought those seeds were beginning to sprout, my missionary activities at the school were deemed problematic. In the end, I was relieved of my position.”

“If you’re not earning money, then how did you manage to buy that fine boat?”

“An American friend who supports my missionary work lent it to me free of charge. And this house too—was built with funds donated by a friend who said, ‘If you’re going to sell architecture, you’ll need a model to show.’ Frankly, I’ve been nothing but dependent on others’ kindness.”

“…Why go to such lengths just to continue preaching?”

“Because it is the mission God has given me.”

Stuart-san lifted his teacup, in which coffee still remained.

2.

“A person’s life is like savoring a cup of coffee. When you’re a child, if it tastes bitter, you don’t have to force yourself to drink it. But when you become an adult, even if it tastes bad, you can’t just stop drinking it—because society is watching.”

With that, he drained in one gulp what was surely by now completely cold coffee.

“The same is true of nations. Fifty years ago, Japan—a young nation newly opened to the world—began struggling with Western influences, flavors it had never before experienced, striving somehow to understand them. But enduring only bitterness is painful. Sometimes, sugar is necessary. God is that spoonful of sugar that softens the bitterness.”

Kihachi looked down at his coffee. On the pitch-black surface, his own deeply sunken face was reflected.

“When I first arrived here, I was anxious. I wondered whether people would accept me, a foreigner preaching a foreign faith. But the people I’ve met, though poor, have overflowed with compassion toward others. Gradually, I began to think that perhaps, right here, I could build the kingdom of God.”

“The kingdom… of God?”

“When you hear ‘kingdom of God,’ you might imagine a world of strict obedience to the Lord—but that is not it. In truth, the Bible does not specifically describe what the kingdom of God is like. But for me, the kingdom of God is a society where people love their neighbors, join hands, and pray for peace.”

Stuart-san’s eyes burned with unwavering resolve as he spoke with growing intensity.

“To become the Lord’s instrument, and to build the kingdom of God right here—this is the mission bestowed upon me by the Lord.”

2.

“The kingdom of God.”  
“The kingdom… of God?”  
“When you hear ‘kingdom of God,’ you might imagine a world of strict obedience to the Lord—but that is not it. In truth, the Bible does not specifically describe what the kingdom of God is like. But for me, the kingdom of God is a society where people love their neighbors, join hands, and pray for peace.” Stuart-san’s eyes burned with unwavering resolve as he spoke with growing intensity. “To become the Lord’s instrument, and to build the kingdom of God right here—this is the mission bestowed upon me by the Lord.”

“Mission? That’s nothing but delusion. Only people can save other people.”

“Kihachi-kun, do you have a flashlight?”

Kihachi stared in shock, but slowly pulled out his *denkōtō*. Stuart-san gave a small nod.

“We are God’s machines. Only when granted the invisible power called God can we become His hands and feet and fulfill our roles. That flashlight, no matter how powerful, won’t function without electricity. Whether it’s God or electricity doesn’t matter. Even if one possesses only a small force, it is those moved by such unseen ‘something’ who save people.”

“So you’re saying coincidence or personal choice is just the work of some god whose existence nobody can prove?”

“I cannot believe that God does not exist. The fact that we are alive in this world at all is the result of countless miracles piled atop one another—it simply cannot be mere chance. It makes far more sense to believe that divine will has acted on our behalf.”

And then, as if trying to convince himself, he continued:

“Even if God did not exist, it remains true that I have been moved by the words of the Bible and the saints.”

“…No. Everyone’s just being cleverly manipulated.”

His protest had devolved into petulant whining, but Stuart-san only smiled gently.

2.

“Growing up isn’t always a good thing. By the time you come to appreciate the taste of coffee, you’ve already picked up a fair share of cunning. But you—you can still honestly say that something bitter is bitter. And right now, that’s enough.”

The act of pretending had been seen through long ago. Exposed in his childishness, he suddenly felt ashamed.

“Back when I was at the commercial school, Seiroku-kun seemed to struggle just as much as you do now, Sakamoto-kun.”

Stuart-san mentioned Seiroku’s name again, and Kihachi weakly lifted his head.

“At that time, one of my initiatives was what I called a ‘Bible class’—an after-school session where volunteers could study English through scripture. On the very first day, Seiroku-kun showed up.”

“He must’ve come to mock it,” Kihachi sneered. “My brother doesn’t believe in God.”

“But when I spoke to him—I admit, I was curious—he looked me straight in the face and asked seriously:  
‘What kind of place is the Kingdom of God in Christianity?’  

Kihachi’s mocking smile vanished. Was this what they called a bolt from the blue?

“After that, Seiroku-kun never missed a single session. He became one of the most diligent students—perhaps *the* most diligent. He kept asking questions about passages concerning the Kingdom of God, especially in the Gospels of Matthew and Luke.”

Stuart-san then held up a flashlight. “This originally belonged to me.”

2.

“My brother doesn’t believe in God.”  
“But when I spoke to him—I admit, I was curious—he looked me straight in the face and asked seriously: ‘What kind of place is the Kingdom of God in Christianity?’”  

Kihachi’s mocking smile vanished. Was this what they called a bolt from the blue?  

“After that, Seiroku-kun never missed a single session. He became one of the most diligent students—perhaps *the* most diligent. He kept asking questions about passages concerning the Kingdom of God, especially in the Gospels of Matthew and Luke.”  

Stuart-san then held up a flashlight. “This originally belonged to me.”  

“It was me who told Seiroku-kun about Santa Claus. Then he begged me to sell him my old, used flashlight—saying it was necessary for his younger brother, who feared the dark.”  

Even as Kihachi was startled by the mention of the flashlight, he clenched his back teeth. “...Why are you talking about this like it has nothing to do with you?”  

“He only became like that because of *you*, Brother. You never thought of anything but your own convenience.”  

“No, he always cared deeply about you, Kihachi-kun. That’s why, even though he studied Christianity, he never sought baptism. ‘If only I go to Heaven,’ he said, ‘I’d be separated from my family who will go to Paradise.’”  

——Paradise? Some invisible thing—I’d never believe in such nonsense.  

Recalling those very words Seiroku had once spoken, Kihachi spat out, “What the hell is that supposed to mean?” Was he implying that *he himself* secretly believed in the afterlife? Stop teasing me already—he clawed at his scalp in frustration.  

“There’s no way my brother believed in Paradise. He always laughed at my catalog prophecies.”  

“《Seventeen: Electric Assistance》… Using electricity to supplement the weakened physical strength of humans.”  

At that moment, words utterly impossible coming from Stuart-san flew from his mouth, and Kihachi could hardly believe his ears.  

“《Eighteen: Restoration Telegraph》… Transmitting thoughts converted into electrical signals, enabling flawless communication between people without misunderstanding.”  

Stuart-san finished reciting the prophecy and lowered the corners of his eyes, gazing at Kihachi, who stood there dazed and lost in utter stupor.

2.

"Afterlife? Stop teasing me already—he clawed at his scalp in frustration. 'There’s no way my brother believed in Paradise. He always laughed at my catalog prophecies.'  
'《Seventeen: Electric Assistance》… Using electricity to supplement the weakened physical strength of humans.'  
At that moment, words utterly impossible coming from Stuart-san flew from his mouth, and Kihachi could hardly believe his ears.  
'《Eighteen: Restoration Telegraph》… Transmitting thoughts converted into electrical signals, enabling flawless communication between people without misunderstanding.'  
Stuart-san finished reciting the prophecy and lowered the corners of his eyes, gazing at Kihachi, who stood there dazed and lost in utter stupor.

'The *Denki Mokuroku*, was it? Actually, I’ve read its contents before. Every prophecy overflowed with love for humanity. Just as I suspected, you are ice cream… Cool-headed, yet concealing a gentle sweetness that cares for others. That’s precisely why God must have entrusted you with the mission of “creating Paradise with electricity.”'

With a mind in turmoil, he barely managed to protest: 'Stop talking about “missions”—please.'

'No. God has guided us here so that the mission may be fulfilled. You wonder how I came to know the contents of the *Denki Mokuroku*? Let me show you the reason.'

Without warning, Stuart stood up, left the parlor, and entered the study next door. After a while, he returned cradling a small furoshiki-wrapped bundle.

'Please, take a look.'

Set upon the table was a long, narrow bundle wrapped in furoshiki.

As his eyes traced its familiar shape, Kihachi’s breath caught—he couldn’t believe it.

With trembling hands, he reached out and grasped the bundle. That weight too—he recognized it. No, it couldn’t be.

He kept repeating to himself that it was impossible, even as he slowly untied the knot. Carefully, he peeled back each layer of cloth. Then, after a single deep breath, he swept the cloth away in one swift motion.

'Ah—' A sound escaped him—half scream, half sob—and Sakamoto Kihachi’s face crumpled.

Revealed beneath was a tattered, folding-bound book. Its edges were scorched in places, its corners worn smooth from handling.

Yet, despite its condition, Seiroku’s handwriting on the cover—*Denki Mokuroku*—remained boldly legible.

'…Did you receive this from my brother?'

'No. Unfortunately, I did not.'

---

2.

No, it couldn’t be. He kept repeating to himself that it was impossible, even as he slowly untied the knot. Carefully, he peeled back each layer of cloth. Then, after a single deep breath, he swept the cloth away in one swift motion.

"Ah—"

A sound escaped him—half scream, half sob—and Sakamoto Kihachi’s face crumpled. Revealed beneath was a tattered, folding-bound book. Its edges were scorched in places, its corners worn smooth from handling. Yet, despite its condition, Seiroku’s handwriting on the cover—*Denki Mokuroku*—remained boldly legible.

"...Did you receive this from my brother?"

"No. Unfortunately, I did not."

Stuart-san shook his head. "Do you see this hole?" he asked, pointing to the corner of the cover.

In the corner of the cover was a small, unfamiliar hole—pierced clean through. When the cover was opened, the hole continued straight through several pages inside.

"This is a bullet hole."

Stuart-san said it calmly, and a chill ran down Kihachi’s spine.

"During the Russo-Japanese War, this book was on the battlefield. Why it was there, or how it came to have a bullet hole, I do not know. The person who brought me this catalog after the war carried a great sense of guilt toward it. Unable to bear its weight any longer, they entrusted it to me."

"Guilt...? Who exactly was that person?"

"I cannot tell you who it was—for now. Until today, I did not know who the true owner of this catalog was. But now that I know it is you, Kihachi-kun, I have decided it must be returned to you."

"...Is it really alright for such a convenient thing to happen? For so many coincidences to line up like this?"

"These are no coincidences. It is God who has guided you, so that you may fulfill your mission. You thought for yourself, set out on your own path, jumped from a train—and thus met me. This seemingly too-perfect connection, arranged by God, was drawn to you by your own will and actions."

Muttering "fate," Kihachi turned the cover. Page one, then two—he flipped each page slowly, his chest tightening with nostalgia each time, until he reached page nineteen. That was as far as he himself had written.

Kihachi took a slow breath and turned the next page.

《Twenty: Denki Nishiki》

2.

"There are no coincidences. It is God who has guided you, so that you may fulfill your mission. You thought for yourself, set out on your own path, jumped from a train—and thus met me. This seemingly too-perfect connection, arranged by God, was drawn to you by your own will and actions." Muttering "fate," Kihachi turned the cover. Page one, then two—he flipped each page slowly, his chest tightening with nostalgia each time, until he reached page nineteen. That was as far as he himself had written. Kihachi took a slow breath and turned the next page.

《Twenty: Denki Nishiki》

The final page of prophecy. There, written in Seiroku’s hand, was a prophecy about which Kihachi had no memory whatsoever.

Could this be that secret reserve sake? But beside it was written only a single line: *"Pungent and dry—truly like electricity."* Was he really supposed to hand this over to Yōsuke?

Afterward, Kihachi reread the *Denki Mokuroku* again and again. Prophecies he had long forgotten were now carefully explained in clumsy handwriting, and as his memories returned, a ticklish warmth stirred in his chest.

He spent quite some time like this, until hunger began to gnaw at his stomach. As if anticipating this, Stuart-san appeared holding a plate bearing neatly cut pieces of dechi yōkan. “If you’d like, please eat,” he said. Hesitantly, Kihachi speared a piece with a toothpick and put it into his mouth.

Unlike the square *neri yōkan*, a specialty of Fushimi, the flat-shaped *dechi yōkan* originated in Hachiman. As he savored its simple sweetness, he idly thought that next time he teased Inako about her figure, he’d compare her to *dechi yōkan* instead.

He could easily imagine her puffing her cheeks and saying, “I’m not *that* flat!”

That’s right—finally, he had obtained the *Denki Mokuroku*.

Regardless of its contents or how it came to be, once he delivered it to Yōsuke, Inako would at last be free.

“That grasshopper—I wonder if he’ll be shocked when he sees this catalog.”

“Kihachi-kun, why do you care so much about Inako-chan?”

Stuart-san’s question caught him completely off guard.

“Suddenly asking something like that… Well, I mean, even if you put it that way…”  

2.

He fumbled with his mouth, but under Stuart-san’s gaze—pure and innocent—Kihachi gave in.

“Inago changes her expression all the time. She squints and looks exasperated, or frightened, or angry, or sad, or serious. And sometimes… she laughs wholeheartedly. When you see it, your heart clears up, you feel cheerful—and you want to see it again. That kind of smile.”

Even though he knew how foolish he sounded, Stuart-san listened with sincere attention.

“That’s her most adorable face, yet she rarely shows it. So I want to make sure she can keep showing that best version of herself forever.”

A noise came from behind.

He turned absently, only to freeze at once—Inako was standing motionless at the entrance to the living room.

“…How long have you been there?”

“Since Stuart-san’s first question,” Saki replied with an affectionate chuckle.

Heat surged violently through Kihachi’s body; hot blood rushed straight to his head. Meanwhile, Inako trembled, her face a complex mix of confusion, near-tears, and shock.

“We just came back from sightseeing around Lake Nako. We’ve become such good friends!”

Shyly, Saki lifted the lid of her basket. Inside were bottles of imported liquor—all completely empty. A dismayed Stuart-san muttered, “I told you so many times—children shouldn’t drink…”

“We were having too much fun… Besides, Inako-chan’s red face isn’t from alcohol, right?”

At this tender remark, Inako clapped both hands over her cheeks and dashed outside.

2.

He stood there dumbfounded, when Saki scolded him, “What are you doing, Kihachi-kun? Go after her!”  

Grumbling inwardly about whose fault this was, Kihachi stood up from his chair. As he was about to pass by her side, Saki called out, “Ah, wait—”  

“I left something behind on the boat. Could you pick it up for me while you’re at it? Inako-chan knows where it is. Well then, I’ll leave it to you.”  

Outside, dusk had fallen, and the shadows of the buildings had stretched long. Scanning the street, he quickly spotted the familiar bob of short hair. He set off in pursuit immediately, but compared to her geta, his Western shoes carried him forward far more swiftly—still, he couldn’t close the distance easily.  

Finally, after struggling to narrow the gap, he called out, “Inago!”  

Panting heavily, Kihachi watched as Inako turned around. Her neatly trimmed hair swayed, her glass-like eyes sparkled in the evening sun, and fine tears slipped from the corners of her eyes, tracing delicate paths down her cheeks.  

He never expected her to cry, and Kihachi stammered helplessly.  

“Did I… say something awful again?”  

Inako wiped her tears with her fingertips, trying to explain: “No, no, that’s not it.”  

“I don’t really understand it myself. I don’t understand… but it’s not sadness.”  

She wiped her tears away and lifted her face, smiling. “It’s nothing at all.”  

They couldn’t just stand frozen in the middle of the street, so the two decided to go retrieve Saki’s forgotten item. But even after following Inako’s directions to the boat, they found nothing resembling what they were looking for.  

Seeing her pout, dissatisfied that their trip had been for nothing, a mischievous impulse suddenly stirred within Kihachi.  

2.

Inako wiped her tears with her fingertips, trying to explain: “No, no, that’s not it. I don’t really understand it myself. I don’t understand… but it’s not sadness.” She wiped her tears away and lifted her face, smiling. “It’s nothing at all.”

They couldn’t just stand frozen in the middle of the street, so the two decided to go retrieve Saki’s forgotten item. But even after following Inako’s directions to the boat, they found nothing resembling what they were looking for.

Seeing her pout, dissatisfied that their trip had been for nothing, a mischievous impulse suddenly stirred within Kihachi.

“This boat… wanna take it out for a spin?”

“Huh? Is that okay?” Inako asked nervously, but Kihachi already helped her onto the boat, then took up the oar and skillfully pushed off from shore. Instantly brightening, Inako cheered, “Wow, we’re gliding along so smoothly!”

“Learned it from my older brother, didn’t I? Never thought it’d come in handy here, though.”

After rowing across Inner Lake for a while, they began to see rice stalks swaying on the water’s surface.

“That paddy field—floating right on the lake. You can only reach it by boat. I wonder what kind of sake we’d get if we brewed it with rice from there…”

Inako gazed thoughtfully at the field, then suddenly looked up as if recalling something.

“Did you know the saying, ‘Years with more lightning bring better rice yields’? You might think it’s just superstition…”

“Nah, not really,” Kihachi replied.

“I’ve heard that the nitrogen in the air gets transformed into nutrients by lightning discharges, and when that seeps into the ground, crops grow better. There was an article like that in *Denki Mokuroku*—‘The Twentieth Century’s Prophecy.’”

“Really?” Inako said, surprised, leaning against the edge of the boat.

“So the age is coming when crops are grown with electricity, huh?”

“Well, the twentieth century *is* the century of electricity.”

Only after saying this did Kihachi realize he’d nearly forgotten the most important thing.

“Oh yeah—I finally found it.”

“What?” Inako asked, just as Kihachi pulled the *Denki Mokuroku* from his breast pocket and held it before her eyes.

2.

Understanding dawned on Inako. “Huh? This is the catalog? But why?” she stammered, flustered. When Kihachi explained, Inako exhaled deeply, as if finally releasing everything she’d suppressed until now.

“So this means I won’t have to marry that centipede man after all.”

A faint smile played on Inako’s lips as her finger traced the hole on the cover. “Wonder what this hole is?”

“It looks like a bullet hole,” Kihachi replied.

Inako’s face froze.

“This catalog seems to have been taken out into war. My older brother might’ve been the one who took it.”

Gently, as if tending to a wound, Inako traced the bullet hole with her fingertip.

“Maybe he carried it as a good-luck charm…”

Kihachi shrugged. “Nah, he wouldn’t do something so sentimental. Knowing him, he probably just brought it along to laugh at when he was bored.”

“Oh, you’re always so suspicious!”

“I don’t believe in what I can’t see,” he said with a chuckle, and Inako burst out laughing. “I know, I know.”

They shared a quiet laugh for a while. Then, suddenly, Inako’s expression turned wistful.

“Kihachi-san… you really can’t bring yourself to believe in gods at all?”

“…After my brother died, I stopped believing in gods or Buddha.”

Kihachi kept his hands on the oar, head bowed, his face strained.

“The more I chant sutras, the more I pass under *torii* gates, the less certain I become about whether the afterlife even exists. It feels like… the idea of gods just fades away from inside me.”

Ever since childhood, there had been times—while reciting prayers or *norito*—when he felt exactly like someone speaking into a phonograph without inserting a *roukan*.  

2.

Inako’s expression turned wistful. “Kihachi-san… you really can’t bring yourself to believe in gods at all?”

“…After my brother died, I stopped believing in gods or Buddha.” Kihachi kept his hands on the oar, head bowed, his face strained. “The more I chant sutras, the more I pass under *torii* gates, the less certain I become about whether the afterlife even exists. It feels like… the idea of gods just fades away from inside me.”

Ever since childhood, there had been times—while reciting prayers or *norito*—when he felt exactly like someone speaking into a phonograph without inserting a *roukan*.

Even so, he’d always believed his voice must surely reach *somewhere*. But when the forbidden shrine opened and Seiroku died, his faith shattered like a burnt-out lightbulb.

“Doubting is exhausting. Once you start doubting—even once—you can never again believe in God wholeheartedly. Belief might be an act of foolishness… but nothing is as difficult or as precious.”

He idly moved the oar, and the water made a small sound.

“If only I could stay believing in God… how much easier life would be. If I could simply and honestly believe that paradise awaits after death, how happy I’d be. But no matter how much I want to believe… I just can’t—*I just can’t*—believe in something I can’t see.”

The oar, suddenly thrust with force, slapped against the water’s surface. Beyond Mount Chōmeiji, the sky shifted from red to blue.

Darkness gradually deepened. Soon, a night would come when nothing could be seen at all.

While he was looking down, Inako quietly stood up and abruptly grabbed both of Kihachi’s sleeves.

“I’ll become God.”

Her eyes, shining like jewels, pierced straight into Kihachi’s, making his heart leap.

“I’ll become your God, Kihachi-san.”

“What do you mean—”

“You’ve never asked God for anything before, have you? So if you show me what I’ve always wanted to see—the real Mount Fuji—then I’ll take God’s place and grant *any one* wish of yours. I’ll prove to you that God exists.”

A breeze blew past, fluttering Inako’s short, fine hair.

“And with me, you know… you can actually *see* me.”

2.

Inako said this, then burst into laughter with all her might.

The moment he saw that smile—brighter than any andon lamp, brighter than a kerosene lamp, brighter than even gaslight—every sound around him vanished. His heart pounded violently, his entire body tingled, frozen in place.

It was an entirely new experience. Seiroku clearly recognized the change taking place within himself.

“Yes,” Inako said, extending her little finger.

“…What? You mean pinky-swear?”

“A promise between us.”

Seiroku cleared his throat, then intertwined his little finger with hers, still feeling warmth in his cheeks.

“I swear I’ll show Mount Fuji to Inako someday.”

After sealing the vow, Inako wore a soft, gentle smile.

“You finally called me by my name.”

“Oh,” Seiroku suddenly felt shy and pouted his lips.

“Would you have preferred ‘Koyadō-chan’ instead?”

“Inago’s fine.”

Inako slowly shook her head.

“No—Inako is better.”

Before night deepened, they hurried back to Stewart-san’s house and disembarked from the boat. From inside came the sound of an organ playing and lively voices. The living room, lit by lamps, was bustling: many young people chatted and laughed, while others played violins along with Stewart-san’s organ music. Saki, holding a bottle of Western liquor, explained, “Stewart-san’s former students arranged to meet here today.”

“More importantly, Inako-chan, you have a visitor.”


2.

“Saki,” Seiroku suddenly felt shy and pouted his lips. “Would you have preferred ‘Koyadō-chan’ instead?”  
“Inago’s fine.”  
Inako slowly shook her head. “No—Inako is better.”  

Before night deepened, they hurried back to Stuart-san’s house and disembarked from the boat. From inside came the sound of an organ playing and lively voices. The living room, lit by lamps, was bustling: many young people chatted and laughed, while others played violins along with Stewart-san’s organ music. Saki, holding a bottle of Western liquor, explained, “Stewart-san’s former students arranged to meet here today.”  
“More importantly, Inako-chan, you have a visitor.”  

Saki pointed to a girl standing with her back turned, wearing a white *kasuri* kimono. A red ribbon tied in her hair caught Sakamoto Kihachi’s eye. As if sensing their presence, the girl turned around, carrying with her a strangely pleasant fragrance. She relaxed her lips into a refined smile.  
“You look well, Inako.”  
“Big Sister? What are you doing here?” Inako exclaimed, startled.  

“I read the newspaper. You tried to commit double suicide, didn’t you?”  

Both Kihachi and Inako stiffened simultaneously. It seemed the incident had become far more serious than they’d imagined.  

“But how did you know we were here?”  

“When Roku-san was at commercial school, I used to attend Bible class with him sometimes, so I’ve gotten close to Reverend Stuart. When I heard you’d been rescued by a Western ship, I thought it might be this one.”  

“Did you come to take Inako back?”  

“I wouldn’t do anything so crude. I came because I was worried—just to check on you.”  

“Oh, Big Sister, listen!”  

An excited Inako held up the *Denki Mokuroku* she’d received from Kihachi.  
“If I deliver this book to Dr. Paikaru, the wedding will be called off. I finally got it!”  

Seeing Inako so joyful, Noriko’s eyes widened at the mention of the *Denki Mokuroku*. The explanation had clearly been insufficient, but after a moment of stunned silence, Noriko’s face softened. She gently pinched Inako’s cheek.  
“That’s good. Now I can rest easy.”  

As the three stood there together, Stewart, who had just finished playing, turned around.  
“Any requests for the next song?”

2.

“Check on you.” “Oh, Big Sister, listen!” An excited Inako held up the *Denki Mokuroku* she’d received from Kihachi. “If I deliver this book to Dr. Paikaru, the wedding will be called off. I finally got it!” Seeing Inako so joyful, Noriko’s eyes widened at the mention of the *Denki Mokuroku*. The explanation had clearly been insufficient, but after a moment of stunned silence, Noriko’s face softened. She gently pinched Inako’s cheek. “That’s good. Now I can rest easy.”

As the three stood there together, Stewart, who had just finished playing, turned around. “Any requests for the next song?”

To the abrupt question, Kihachi answered, “Not for me…,” while Inako shyly raised her hand.

“I’d like to hear the Salvation Army song—‘Koha Dōhō’—if possible.”

Stewart tilted his head with an awkward smile—clearly unable to grasp the reference. But when Saki stepped in and suggested, “Could it be ‘The Battle Hymn of the Republic’?” he nodded. “Ah,” he said, and immediately began to play.

“Oh? So that was originally a foreign song?”

Saki replied, one hand still holding the sake bottle, “It’s an American song. In Japanese, they call it ‘Ripaburikku Sanka,’ I believe.”

“Everyone, please sing along!”

“But I don’t know the English lyrics,” Inako said, flustered.

“Then sing it with the lyrics you love, Inako-chan.”

Before long, Inako began singing modestly: “Koha dōhō o horobi yori—,” and Noriko joined in right after. Kihachi borrowed a book with the lyrics and started singing loudly in English, matching the rhythm around him.

Inako and Saki clasped hands and began dancing wildly, improvising their steps. Kihachi stood beside the man playing the violin, swaying his shoulders as he sang at the top of his lungs, while Noriko laughed and clapped along.

Their languages and dances didn’t match—nothing was uniform—but it was extraordinarily joyful. As Kihachi sang, he thought: if people all over the world could dance together like this, perhaps world peace wouldn’t be so difficult after all.

2.

“We’ll take a short break,” Stuart-san said, approaching while rubbing his fingers. Kihachi looked around at the people chatting warmly and laughing together, and felt a pang of regret.

“I wish I’d brought a phonograph. I wanted to preserve this atmosphere somehow.”

“Preserve it? We don’t have a phonograph, but there is another way.”

When Stuart-san reappeared holding a portable camera, Inako froze. As her former students lined up, smiling for the photograph, Inako trembled, hiding behind Kihachi. Then, when Stuart-san turned the camera toward Kihachi, Noriko stared in disbelief at Inako, whose face had gone deathly pale.

“Inako’s always been like this—runs away whenever someone tries to take her photo.”

“If your soul’s really gonna get stolen, then all those folks just now would’ve dropped dead already.”

After a moment’s hesitation, Kihachi silently reached out, took Inako’s arm, and gently pulled her to stand beside him.

“If your soul starts getting sucked out, I’ll yank it right back.”

He tightened his grip softly on her arm. Inako looked up at him with wide eyes, startled—and he quickly turned his face away, flustered.

“I’ll hold on tight, don’t worry.”

“…Okay. Please.”

Inako leaned against him slightly; through the fabric of their clothes, he could feel the warmth of her arm. Just as he began growing restless himself, the shutter clicked.



　　　　　　　　　　＊



Among the former students, there was one man who had remained seated the entire time. When Stuart-san asked about it, the man explained he had sprained his ankle a few days prior and couldn’t move vigorously.



2.

“Shall we try the electrotherapy device? I’ll bring it.”

As Stuart-san stepped away inside, Inako turned to Kihachi and asked, “What’s an electrotherapy device?”

“It’s like an electric massage. A device that uses electricity to stimulate affected areas and ease symptoms. Back in the day, they called it an *erekiteru*.”

When Stuart returned, he carried a wooden box resembling a medicine chest. Opening the lid revealed a complex circuit of exposed wires, a coil-wound cylinder, and iron pieces. As Stuart connected a dry cell battery to the wires inside the box, the iron piece immediately began striking the cylinder—*tatatatatata*—as if sending a telegraph signal.

“It started moving on its own!” Inako exclaimed in surprise.

“It’s an electromagnet,” Kihachi explained.

“It’s not an ordinary magnet. It only gains magnetic force when electricity flows through it. When current passes through this wire-wound cylinder—the coil—it becomes an electromagnet and pulls the iron piece toward it. When the current stops, the magnetism vanishes and the iron piece drops. Right now, that cycle is repeating at high speed.”

Kihachi spoke with growing enthusiasm about how this circuit was designed to generate the alternating current needed for electrotherapy, but Inako, nodding vigorously, quietly gave up trying to understand.

“So something that wasn’t a magnet becomes one just by electricity… How strange.”

As she remained transfixed by the motion of the electromagnet, one of the former students, who had placed the wire leads—thin conductors extending from the box like kite strings—on his feet, said, “I don’t think electricity is flowing.”

2.

Quick to sense something amiss, Kihachi cheerfully sprang toward the electrotherapy device, shouting, “Having trouble with it?”—and without waiting for an answer, immediately began tinkering with its insides.  

“The circuit generating the alternating current is running, so the problem must lie somewhere beyond the induction coil.”  

Soon, Kihachi found a break in the wire and, borrowing tools from Stuart-san, spliced the conductor back together. Instantly, electricity flowed through the leads, and his former student exhaled in relief, muttering, “There we go.”  

“To understand electrical circuits at your age—now that’s impressive.”  

As his students expressed admiration, Stuart-san clapped Kihachi on the shoulder and said, “Kihachi-kun here is going to create Paradise using electricity, they say.” Kihachi gave a small, self-satisfied smile, clearly not at all displeased.  

“Well then, sounds like we’ve got something to look forward to. Guess we’d better hit the books hard from now on,” said one of the students, and the group gathered around Kihachi, chatting warmly about their dreams. Watching them, Inako felt a sediment settling deep in her chest.  

“Oh, already this late? I’d better head home.”  

Saki glanced down at her wristwatch and spoke. After exchanging farewells with Stuart-san and the others, she turned to leave—when Inako suddenly said, “Ah, I’ll walk you partway.”  

“It’s been such a pleasant day. Haven’t had one like this in ages.”  

Saki said this as they walked along the dimly lit street, where light spilled from the townhouses.  

“By the way, did you suddenly feel like getting some fresh air, Inako-chan?”  

“You can tell?” Inako replied, caught off guard, and stuck out her tongue shyly.

2.

A sediment settled deep in her chest. “Oh, already this late? I’d better head home.” Saki glanced down at her wristwatch and spoke. After exchanging farewells with Stuart-san and the others, she turned to leave—when Inako suddenly said, “Ah, I’ll walk you partway.”

“It’s been such a pleasant day. Haven’t had one like this in ages.”  
Saki said this as they walked along the dimly lit street, where light spilled from the townhouses.  
“By the way, did you suddenly feel like getting some fresh air, Inako-chan?”  
“You can tell?” Inako replied, caught off guard, and stuck out her tongue shyly.

“I was just thinking how envious I am of Mr. Kihachi—how he moves straight toward what he wants, never looking sideways. Compared to him… I don’t seem to have anything like that myself. …Though he said, ‘You just haven’t found your reason to live yet.’”

“There’s a saying,” Saki smiled gently, “*Under the lamplight, it’s darkest beneath the lamp.*”  

“What you’re searching for might be so close you’ve failed to notice it.”  

“Do you really think so?” Inako sighed. Saki gave her back a reassuring pat.  
“Don’t rush yourself.”  
“In fact, why not find it together—with Kihachi-kun?”

Among the row of townhouses stood a residence with a tall pine tree rising over its wooden fence. Saki stopped and stretched upward on tiptoe.  
“Well then, I should get back to work too.”  

“Come to think of it, I heard you’re a businesswoman, Saki-san?”  
“That’s right. I’ve an important business meeting coming up in Ise.”  
“Ise? How wonderful… I’ve always wanted to go there someday.”  
“Oh, please do visit anytime. My family’s from Matsusaka—I’ll show you around.”  

The moment Inako heard *Matsusaka*, something tugged at her awareness.  
Today at Inner Lake had been the same—there was something oddly familiar about Saki’s words.  
Relatives in Ōmi, Vancouver… and now Matsusaka.  

“Um… now that I think of it, what was your family name again, Saki-san?”  

Saki clapped her hands once. “Ah!” Then, with a theatrical clearing of her throat:  
“It’s Mizoe. Allow me to reintroduce myself—I am Mizoe Saki.”

2.

Saki laughed lightly, as if joking. It was the same bright smile that always lifted Inako’s spirits. But now, Inako could no longer accept that smile with the pure openness she had felt just minutes before.

“…So, Mizoe Yōsuke—is he a relative of yours, Saki-san?”

“Yes, Yōsuke is my older brother.”

Why am I such a fool? she cursed inwardly. The story she’d heard from Yōsuke at the restaurant in Ōtsu, and the one Saki had told her today at Inner Lake—weren’t they nearly identical?

Did Saki know about her connection to Yōsuke? Was Saki hiding something from her?

“But then… how do you know my brother, Inako-chan?”

Saki’s cheerful smile flickered with a shadow of Yōsuke’s presence.

“…He was appointed branch manager at the Fushimi branch, so I met him then.”

Stammering the reply, Inako received only a cool, “Ah, yes, that’s right,” and a faint nod from Saki.

“Well then, Inako-chan, if you ever come to Matsusaka again, do get in touch.”

With a fluttering wave, Saki disappeared into the house. A deep unease stirred in Inako’s chest, but pondering it further was pointless. For now, everything would be all right once she delivered the *Denki Mokuroku* to Kihachi. She needed to return to Kihachi’s place as quickly as possible.

Just as she turned on her heel to leave—

“Ho there, Inako-chan?” a thick, oily male voice oozed from the darkness.

A chill shot through her body, freezing her in place. From the shadows, Yōsuke emerged soundlessly, his faint, unsettling smirk illuminated by the feeble light spilling from the townhouse.

“Never expected to run into you here. What exactly are you doing in a place like this?”

2.

but pondering it further was pointless. For now, everything would be all right once she delivered the *Denki Mokuroku* to Kihachi. She needed to return to Kihachi’s place as quickly as possible. Just as she turned on her heel to leave—  
“Ho there, Inako-chan?” a thick, oily male voice oozed from the darkness. A chill shot through her body, freezing her in place. From the shadows, Yōsuke emerged soundlessly, his faint, unsettling smirk illuminated by the feeble light spilling from the townhouse. “Never expected to run into you here. What exactly are you doing in a place like this?”

“…I was meeting with Saki-san.”

At the mention of Saki’s name, Yōsuke’s face darkened. “So you met your sister, did you? I was thinking of dropping by our relatives to say hello, but I’d rather not lay eyes on her.” He paused. “By the way, did you find the *Denki Mokuroku*?”

“Y-yes, I found it.”

“Oh really?” Yōsuke’s eyes softened for just an instant, but then narrowed again at Inako’s nervous demeanor. “Hmm. Suspicious. You’re not just making something up again so you can run off, are you?”

“Kihachi-san has it now. I’ll show it to you shortly.”

As Inako turned to leave, Yōsuke rested his chin in his hand. “Kihachi-kun, is it?  
Well now… I just heard an interesting little story—about that very man.”

Inako froze. Yōsuke twisted his mouth into a cruel, knowing grin.

　　　　　　　　　　＊

Back at home, after his students had left and the living room had quieted, Kihachi sat in a chair flipping through the *Denki Mokuroku*.  
“Can I take a look too?” Noriko asked, peering over his shoulder. Her long, loose hair brushed against his cheek.

“No, uh… this is just some doodles I made as a kid.”

He hesitated, embarrassed at the thought of a woman like Noriko reading his childish scribbles. But before he could stop her, she slipped an arm lightly around his neck from behind—and startled, he dropped the *Denki Mokuroku*, which she snatched up triumphantly.

“Just for a moment!” he stammered inwardly, flustered despite himself.

Noriko’s slender fingers traced the cover. Then she noticed it—a small hole pierced in one corner.  

2.

“I take a look too?” Noriko asked, peering over his shoulder. Her long, loose hair brushed against his cheek. “No, uh… this is just some doodles I made as a kid.” He hesitated, embarrassed at the thought of a woman like Noriko reading his childish scribbles. But before he could stop her, she slipped an arm lightly around his neck from behind—and startled, he dropped the *Denki Mokuroku*, which she snatched up triumphantly. “Just for a moment!” he stammered inwardly, flustered despite himself.

Noriko’s slender fingers traced the cover. Then she noticed it—a small hole pierced in one corner.

“It looks like a bullet hole,” he said. “I don’t know the full story myself, but it’s apparently from the Russo-Japanese War.”

“…I see,” Noriko murmured, flipping through the pages.

Silence filled the room, broken only by the ticking clock. She glanced up at the wall clock.

“Inako should’ve come back by now, don’t you think? She was only supposed to be seeing someone off.”

Kihachi sprang to his feet instinctively. Seeing his reaction, Noriko smiled gently.  
“Would you mind going to meet her? Just forgive me for asking. Maybe she got lost along the way.”

It wasn’t impossible. Kihachi picked up a lamp from the living room and stepped outside.

Following the faint glimmers of light from homes and streetlamps, he walked down the dark road, sweat beading on his forehead.

A short while later, he spotted a familiar figure disappearing onto the path leading toward Hachiman Station.

“Inako!”

As he stepped beyond the town’s edge into the unlit stretch of road, he called out ahead. In the darkness, the figure flinched. Panting, he drew closer—his lamp revealing Inako’s silhouette.

“This way leads to Hachiman Station. Where are you going?”

He tugged her arm, trying to turn her back toward the path they’d come from, but Inako stood rooted in place.

“Inako?”

“I’ve… I’ve wanted to thank you, Kihachi-san, for so long.”

“What’s suddenly brought this on?”

“You showed me the *sosui* boat, Lake Biwa, Ōmi-Fuji… Western clothes, shoes, even an organ. Because of you, I’ve learned so many things I never knew before. Truly, thank you.”

“The thanks can wait. We can’t let our guard down until I hand over the *Denki Mokuroku*.”

2.

The arm holding the lamp felt the small touch of Inako’s hand, slowly drawing closer.

Toward Kihachi, whose heart pounded like a frantic bell, Inako offered a gentle smile.

“That’s why… stay well.”

In a whisper, she exhaled softly over the firebox, snuffing out the lamp’s flame.

Darkness swallowed everything. Instantly, his breath grew tight, sweat gushing from his forehead.

“Inako—?”

No answer came. Only the rapid footsteps fading swiftly from the spot.

Before he could even think *why*, his limbs went numb and immobile. Kihachi collapsed where he stood.

Left behind in darkness again. An indescribable terror crashed over him, yet his body would not obey.

“Why…” His whispered voice was lost beneath the chorus of frogs and the rustling of swaying rice stalks.

His consciousness blurred; his sense of time numbed and slipping away. Then, at last, someone came sprinting toward him.

He heard the scratch of a match being struck, a flame flickering to life. Kihachi opened his eyes weakly. Lamp light fell upon his face. As his vision adjusted, the features of Roku looking down at him sharpened into clarity.

“…You’re…”

“I’ve been searching everywhere. Never thought I’d find you here in Hachiman Town.”

Kihachi staggered to his feet and, taking up the lamp, began walking toward the station.

“Wait—where are you going?” Roku grabbed his shoulder.

“I’ve got to go after Inako…”

“But Inako-san already left—she took the train back with Yōsuke-san just now from Hachiman Station.”

At the sudden mention of Yōsuke’s name, a cold wave surged through Kihachi’s chest.

---

2.

Kihachi opened his eyes weakly. Lamp light fell upon his face. As his vision adjusted, the features of Roku looking down at him sharpened into clarity. “…You’re…” “I’ve been searching everywhere. Never thought I’d find you here in Hachiman Town.” Kihachi staggered to his feet and, taking up the lamp, began walking toward the station. “Wait—where are you going?” Roku grabbed his shoulder. “I’ve got to go after Inako…” “But Inako-san already left—she took the train back with Yōsuke-san just now from Hachiman Station.” At the sudden mention of Yōsuke’s name, a cold wave surged through Kihachi’s chest.

“If that’s the case, then I *have* to chase after her!”

He tried to step forward, but Roku’s hand on his shoulder held firm.

“Let go. That guy… he might’ve twisted things again, driven himself into some corner.”

The *Denki Mokuroku* has been found, hasn’t it? You made a pinky swear, didn’t you?

You promised each other—you’d show Inako the real Mount Fuji, become a god, grant her wishes.

“He’d never break a promise like that! He’s nothing like my brother, who only ever lied!”

With those words, Kihachi lunged at Roku, who seized him by the collar and glared down with furious indignation.

“No matter if you’re his brother—I won’t allow anyone to insult my closest friend!”

Frozen in place, Kihachi stood rigid beneath Roku’s glare. The grip on his collar loosened. Their ragged breaths echoed across the rice fields.

“We were together at commercial school.”

“…I didn’t know that. My brother never mentioned it.”

“I’ve heard plenty about you—from him. About you, and your *Denki Mokuroku*.”

Kihachi’s composure, just beginning to settle, was instantly shaken anew.

“The *Denki Mokuroku* has been found,” Kihachi blurted out.

“What did you say?”

“It doesn’t matter—once we deliver the catalog to Dr. Paikaru, Inako will be saved!”

Kihachi turned and ran. “Wait!” Roku called, chasing after him.

They dashed through town, lantern flame flickering wildly, all the way back to Stuart-san’s house. But the living room was empty—Noriko, who had just moments ago been reading the *Denki Mokuroku*, was nowhere to be seen.

“Kihachi-kun, why are you in such a rush? …Oh, Roku-kun?”

---

2.

“You, and your *Denki Mokuroku*.” Kihachi’s composure, just beginning to settle, was instantly shaken anew. “The *Denki Mokuroku* has been found,” Kihachi blurted out. “What did you say?”  
“It doesn’t matter—once we deliver the catalog to Dr. Paikaru, Inako will be saved!” Kihachi turned and ran.  
“Wait!” Roku called, chasing after him.  

They dashed through town, lantern flame flickering wildly, all the way back to Stuart-san’s house. But the living room was empty—Noriko, who had just moments ago been reading the *Denki Mokuroku*, was nowhere to be seen.  

“Kihachi-kun, why are you in such a rush? …Oh, Roku-kun?”

Stuart poked his head out from the kitchen, and Roku bowed politely.

“Stuart-san, where is Noriko?”

At Kihachi’s desperate question, Stuart blinked in mild surprise.

“If you mean Noriko, she said, ‘I’ll go look for my sister too,’ and left not long ago.”

　　　　　　　　　　＊

—*Noriko’s a strong girl; she’ll be fine.*

Ever since childhood, people had always said that about her.

To her father, the maids, and her relatives alike, Noriko had always been valued as a child who “required no fuss.” At the same time, there lingered an unspoken atmosphere that would never permit her to act clingy or vulnerable.

Yet the one person who truly—and above all—understood Noriko’s nature was her mother, Nae’ko.

—*I know perfectly well that deep down, Noriko’s a crybaby. I do.*

Whenever she struggled with her lessons, it was to Nae’ko’s room at night that she’d sneak for quiet help. On days when something hurt her, it was against Nae’ko’s chest that she’d cry. To Noriko, Nae’ko was the only place where she could let her guard down completely—the only soul with whom she could speak her true feelings.

But even Nae’ko soon became Inako’s.

Nae’ko spent most of her days in the brewery. The smell of the sake warehouse repelled Noriko—she couldn’t bring herself to step inside. Yet Inako walked in and out with ease, utterly unfazed. Whenever Noriko caught sight of Inako chatting happily outside the storehouse with the *kurabito* or with Nae’ko, she felt shut out, as if she alone were being excluded.

2.

It was against Nae’ko’s chest that she’d cry. To Noriko, Nae’ko was the only place where she could let her guard down completely—the only soul with whom she could speak her true feelings. But even Nae’ko soon became Inako’s. Nae’ko spent most of her days in the brewery. The smell of the sake warehouse repelled Noriko—she couldn’t bring herself to step inside. Yet Inako walked in and out with ease, utterly unfazed. Whenever Noriko caught sight of Inako chatting happily outside the storehouse with the *kurabito* or with Nae’ko, she felt shut out, as if she alone were being excluded.

When Moneko died while Noriko was fourteen, she realized the one person she could depend on for comfort was gone—and at the funeral itself, she never once cried. She carried herself with composure, remaining the dutiful girl everyone expected her to be.

Because she believed that this—acting this way—was the only way to survive in this household.

Some time later, she went to visit an Inari Shrine to clear her mind. Perhaps her spirit, despite her brave front, had grown weary; she accidentally misstepped on the stone steps and nearly fell. It was such a small thing—but it was enough to pierce the dam where she had long held back her emotions, and tears quietly welled up in her eyes.

“What’s this? Did you twist your ankle?”

She was sitting on the stone steps, silently fighting back tears, when a voice called down from above. Squinting upward, she saw a young man in flowing robes. He had a slender frame, but his eyes were sharp and intense.

“Seiroku-san…? What are you doing in a place like this?”

“I was making a delivery for the shop—just brought candles to one of the parishioners here.”

Noriko had first met Seiroku at Stuart-san’s Bible class.

While Jinbei’emon conducted business or casual conversation at Riku Tsuneichi Shōten in Ōtsu, Noriko occasionally accompanied Roku and visited Stuart-san’s home to attend the Bible class.

Stuart-san’s sermons on the Bible had been incomprehensible, but the games using English words were fun—so much so that even when there was no errand to run, she would coax the maids into taking her along.

2.

“Seiroku-san…? What are you doing in a place like this?”

“I was making a delivery for the shop—just brought candles to one of the parishioners here.”  

Noriko had first met Seiroku at Stuart-san’s Bible class. While Jinbei’emon conducted business or casual conversation at Riku Tsuneichi Shōten in Ōtsu, Noriko occasionally accompanied Roku and visited Stuart-san’s home to attend the Bible class. Stuart-san’s sermons on the Bible had been incomprehensible, but the games using English words were fun—so much so that even when there was no errand to run, she would coax the maids into taking her along.

She had grown somewhat close to Seiroku too, but he always teased her—she was still just a grade-schooler back then—and never stopped cracking jokes. Because of that, Noriko had always found him difficult, awkward. To think she’d run into this man of all people here.

“I twisted my ankle,” she admitted, “but I’ll be able to walk again soon. Please, don’t trouble yourself.”

“That’s rough. Hurting your foot out here in the mountains like this. Where were you headed anyway?”

“To Goshendani’s sacred mound,” she blurted out before forcing a polite smile.

“You must be in a hurry. Once I’ve rested a bit, I’ll be fine on my own. You really don’t need to worry about me.”

But instead of leaving, Seiroku hoisted her onto his back without another word.

“H-hey! Put me down!”

Kicking and squirming without a care for decorum, Noriko wriggled as Seiroku began climbing the stone steps.

“I’m done here. I’ll take you.”

“But—this is such a public place… Don’t treat me like a child!”

“What’s a child saying?”

“I can manage by myself. Let me down!”

“Look, no matter how hard you act grown-up, your true self shows through. A kid should learn to lean on someone while they still can.”

It felt as though he could see right through her. Noriko clenched her teeth tightly. His back was much smaller than Roku’s—but unexpectedly warm. She was surprised by how comforting it felt.

As promised, he carried her all the way to Goshendani’s sacred mound and waited while she finished her prayers. Then, without warning, he scooped her up again, declaring, “I’ll show you a good spot,” and proceeded to carry her along another pilgrimage path until they reached Akubi Ōmyōjin’s sacred mound.

2.

"At my house, we’ve got a shrine enshrining the *bunrei*—the divided spirit—of this very deity. My younger brother worships it devoutly."

"Why did you bring me here, then?"

"I came across a little miss who looked like she was about to burst into tears any second. I couldn’t just leave her and walk away, could I?"

"A-Ah… I just sprained my foot. That’s why my eyes were watery."

"Is that so? To me, you looked like you were holding back tears with all your might."

Again, the dam inside her trembled, threatening to overflow. She clamped her mouth shut, gritting her teeth tightly.

"Crying… such a childish thing to do."

"You know, insisting on being strong is what seems childish to me."

Seiroku turned his face aside, deliberately shifting his gaze toward the vast scenery spread out below.

"Here, no one can see you even if you cry."

And with that mischievous remark from Seiroku, the floodgates she’d been straining to hold back gave way completely.

All her pent-up emotions spilled forth with her tears, soaking into the earth beneath her.

"Cry honestly while you still can. Once you’re an adult, you won’t be able to cry so freely anymore."

He gently stroked Noriko’s head as she sobbed quietly.

It must have been half an hour she spent weeping. Throughout it all, Seiroku asked nothing—just stayed silently by her side, waiting.

"...I’m sorry for making you witness such an undignified scene. And thank you—bringing me all the way to Goshendani, too. Please let me repay you somehow next time."

Seiroku waved it off, saying it was nothing, but after a brief back-and-forth, he finally relented.

"Alright, alright… But when you say ‘next time,’ where exactly are we supposed to meet?"  

2.

"You won’t be able to cry so freely anymore." He gently stroked Noriko’s head as she sobbed quietly. It must have been half an hour she spent weeping. Throughout it all, Seiroku asked nothing—just stayed silently by her side, waiting. "...I’m sorry for making you witness such an undignified scene. And thank you—bringing me all the way to Goshendani, too. Please let me repay you somehow next time."

Seiroku waved it off, saying it was nothing, but after a brief back-and-forth, he finally relented. "Alright, alright… But when you say ‘next time,’ where exactly are we supposed to meet?"

"Next month, come here. This place probably won’t draw any attention, right?"

When Noriko smiled, Seiroku, momentarily dumbfounded, replied with a chuckle: "Well now, I suppose you're right."

The following month, when Noriko went to Akubi Ōmyōjin’s sacred mound, Seiroku was there waiting for her, just as promised.

From then on, Noriko found one excuse after another to meet Seiroku in front of the sacred mound, where they shared idle, lighthearted conversation. They spoke of their families, of Seiroku’s work at the Buddhist ritual shop, of how Sakamoto Kihachi could no longer afford middle school because funds meant for repairing Zenshoku-ji’s main hall had run out, and also of Kihachi’s *Denki Mokuroku*.

"Onee-chan, you sometimes look so happy reading letters—what are those from? Who are they from?"

One day, while reading a letter from Seiroku in her room, Inako came in, rubbing her eyes, and asked curiously.

"These? These are letters from Akubi Ōmyōjin himself. If you believe in the deity, they get sent to you."

Even if it was her beloved little sister asking, she couldn’t possibly tell the truth. It was a painful lie, but it worked perfectly on Inako. Her eyes sparkling, Inako gasped, “Letters from a god?” Noriko pressed a finger to her lips. “It’s a secret letter, so you mustn’t tell anyone.”

At home or outside, Noriko continued living each day on constant high alert. Yet in front of the sacred mound, when she could talk freely with Seiroku, laugh at his jokes, and snap back at his teasing without restraint, she didn’t need to hold herself stiffly at all. Those moments with Seiroku reminded her vividly of the times she’d spent alone with her late sister, Moneko.

2.

Yet Noriko also felt a sense of frustration toward Seiroku’s attitude—somehow reminiscent of how one might treat a younger sister. As she wondered if there was anything she could do for him, an idea suddenly struck her, and she retrieved a paulownia box from the chest of drawers.

Inside the box lay a bundle of papers tied together with string.

As she gazed absently at it, a voice came from outside the sliding door: “I’m coming in.” The door slid open, and Roku entered with his usual stern expression. “What’s that?” he asked, pointing at the bundle in Noriko’s hands.

“It’s notes on a sake called *Denki Nishiki*.”

Noriko handed the notes to Roku. Their contents appeared to concern the brewing method of this *Denki Nishiki* sake, but since Noriko had little knowledge of brewery work, she barely understood any of it.

“Why do you have something like this?”

“Okaa-san gave it to me before she passed away. She said, ‘I couldn’t be around much for you, so here’s my treasure.’ …Honestly, I can’t even stand the taste of sake.”

—She didn’t utter a word about how she would have preferred just a little more time together over such an object.

“But someday you’ll have to overcome that. It looks bad for the daughter of a brewery to dislike sake.”

“If it were that easy, I wouldn’t be struggling,” Noriko retorted, snatching the notes back from Roku.

“And don’t handle it carelessly, please. Okaa-san told me specifically to pass these notes on to my future husband.”

Roku paused for a moment, then muttered sullenly, “I see. That was thoughtless of me.”

“That sharp tongue of yours. Your future bride is going to suffer, whoever she is.”

2.

She would have preferred just a little more time together over such an object.  
“But someday you’ll have to overcome that. It looks bad for the daughter of a brewery to dislike sake.”  
“If it were that easy, I wouldn’t be struggling,” Noriko retorted, snatching the notes back from Roku. “And don’t handle it carelessly, please. Okaa-san told me specifically to pass these notes on to my future husband.”  

Roku paused for a moment, then muttered sullenly, “I see. That was thoughtless of me.”  
“That sharp tongue of yours. Your future bride is going to suffer, whoever she is.”  

“Don’t worry about it. There’s no need to give this to Mr. Roku.”  

Moneko stood up and began preparing to go out. “I’ll be on my way now.”  

“Where are you off to?”  

“To visit Inari-san. Today’s the day for my regular monthly pilgrimage.”  

After leaving the house, she met Seiroku at Akubi Ōmyōjin’s sacred mound and promptly handed him the notes on *Denki Nishiki*.  

“*Denki Nishiki*… The slogan is, ‘Pungent and dry—truly like electricity.’”  

“Kihachi-kun hasn’t even filled half his catalogue yet, has he? Use this.”  

“But even so, the catalogue is something Kihachi should come up with himself. He needs to find the answers on his own.”  

When Seiroku tried to return the notes, Noriko pushed them back with both hands.  

“Then at least copy them into the catalogue if you absolutely can’t think of anything.”  

“But isn’t this an important book? Is it really alright to take it out like this?”  

Seiroku thrust the notes back at her again.  

“If a brewery collapses just because one book is taken out, then it was never more than a second-rate sake warehouse to begin with.”  

“You’re such a reckless one.”  

“Stop complaining and just accept this, as a gesture of goodwill from me.”  

Seiroku, shoved the notes into his hands, stared blankly. “A… gesture?”  

“Ah—” Noriko’s entire face flushed red.  
“I—remembered something I need to do. I’ll go now. But anyway, consider it a gift.”  

And with that, Noriko fled the spot, leaving Seiroku still dazed behind her.  

—*I gave it. I really gave it.* With each step she took racing down the long approach, Noriko’s heart leapt with quiet delight.

---

2.

It had never been more than a second-rate sake warehouse to begin with.”  
“You’re such a reckless one.”  
“Stop complaining and just accept this, as a gesture of goodwill from me.”  

Seiroku, shoved the notes into his hands, stared blankly.  
“A… gesture?”  

“Ah—” Noriko’s entire face flushed red. “I—I remembered something I need to do. I’ll go now. But anyway, consider it a gift.”  

And with that, Noriko fled the spot, leaving Seiroku still dazed behind her.  
—*I gave it. I really gave it.*  
With each step she took racing down the long approach, Noriko’s heart leapt with quiet delight.  
—2.  

She was breathing faster than usual, her chest growing warm. Seiroku surely had no idea what was going on. If she ever explained the meaning behind those notes to him now, what kind of expression would cross his face?  

As a strange blend of anxiety and anticipation swelled within her, Noriko briefly savored the sensation of her body transforming into a hot-air balloon, slowly lifting off the ground.  

It was a single remark from Jinbei’emon a few days later that drove a nail into that feeling.  

“Your fiancé has been decided. Ken’go-kun from Riku Tsuneichi Shōten.”  

In Jinbei’emon’s room, Noriko sat frozen in formal seiza. Her hollow eyes followed the curling blue smoke rising from his cigarette.  

“He’s been under our care since childhood. You know each other well enough, don’t you?”  

This was no joke. With Riku, she could barely recall a single conversation that hadn’t turned into an argument—how could they possibly know each other “well enough”?  

“No objections, I assume?”  

But Jinbei’emon’s eyes held the sharpness of a hunter, and pinned beneath that gaze, Noriko found herself unable to move. The buoyant feeling deflated instantly, and her body grew utterly heavy.  

Early summer of Meiji 36 (1903). At a teahouse by Yotsutsuji, located at Inari Shrine, Noriko sat beside Seiroku, eating ice cream served in small bowls while gazing down at the sweeping view of Shijōkura below.  

“Hey, it’s melting.”  

Startled by Seiroku’s voice, Noriko—lost in thought—hurriedly shoveled the ice cream into her mouth.  

“How unusual. Noriko, you’re completely spaced out.”  

2.

“Maybe it’s the heat getting to me,” Noriko murmured, lifting a spoonful of ice cream to her lips, when she overheard the conversation of middle-aged men seated on the adjacent bench, nibbling dango.

“That English phrase ‘I love you’—don’t you think translating it as *‘wagimi o aisu*’ lacks flair?”

At the word *aisu*, Noriko’s heart leapt.

“Well, it means that, so what else can you do? Just because you’re a *rakugo* storyteller doesn’t mean you have to twist everything into a joke.”

“You’re such a dull man as always. Even in this age of civilization and enlightenment, you should still value poetic sentiment. For instance…”

The man raised his empty dango skewer toward the faintly visible moon in the daytime sky.

“How about something like, ‘The moon is beautiful’—doesn’t that feel more Japanese, more fitting?”

“That makes no sense at all. What does the moon have to do with love? We’re in the twentieth century now. With sensibilities this outdated, we’ll never catch up to the West.”

Listening to their foolish banter, Noriko turned to Seiroku and asked, “Seiroku-san, how would you translate it?”

“Hmm… How about *‘Wagimi o aisukurīmu to omou’*—I think of you as ice cream?”

“What on earth does that mean?”

“Can’t you tell? It’s a pun—*aisu* from *aisu*, and *aisukurīmu*. If literal translation and poetic elegance fail, why not go for a witty play on words?”

“You’re an idiot,” she snapped dismissively, finishing off the last of her ice cream. Beside her, the rakugo-telling man chuckled softly, shaking his shoulder. “‘Love’ and ‘ice cream’… Now that’s clever.”

After the men had left, Seiroku stood, saying, “Shall we head out too?” But Noriko caught his sleeve and tugged him back down.

---

2.

“‘Wagimi o aisukurīmu to omou’—I think of you as ice cream?”  
“What on earth does that mean?”  
“Can’t you tell? It’s a pun—*aisu* from *aisu*, and *aisukurīmu*. If literal translation and poetic elegance fail, why not go for a witty play on words?”  
“You’re an idiot,” she snapped dismissively, finishing off the last of her ice cream.  

Beside her, the rakugo-telling man chuckled softly, shaking his shoulder.  
“‘Love’ and ‘ice cream’… Now that’s clever.”  

After the men had left, Seiroku stood, saying, “Shall we head out too?”  
But Noriko caught his sleeve and tugged him back down.

“……I want to stay here longer… I want to eat ice cream with Seiroku-san.”

Seiroku had been staring intently into Noriko’s eyes, but after a moment, he offered a faint smile, like one soothing a child.

“Don’t eat any more. You’ll get fat.”

As he urged her forward with a “Come on, let’s go,” Noriko followed behind him, crestfallen.

When they reached the sacred mound of Akubi Ōmyōjin, Seiroku turned around with a sigh.

“Don’t say such reckless things in public. If word gets out, you might end up unable to live at home.”

“……Recently, my future husband was decided.”

Seiroku lifted his eyelids slightly and murmured, “Who’s the match?”

“……I’m sorry. I can’t say.”

She didn’t want to say. If he knew the man was someone close to him, Seiroku would surely say, “That’s good,” and pull away from her. She didn’t want those words. What Noriko wanted was something entirely different.

“Well then, that’s good. At least you won’t have to worry about being left unmarried anymore.”

Yet Seiroku, of all people, calmly spoke the one thing she least wanted to hear.

Noriko narrowed her eyes sharply and stepped toward him. “I don’t want this!”

“But even if you say you don’t want it, refusing carelessly might get you disowned, won’t it?”

“If that happens, I’ll run away to your place.”

“What, become my sister-in-law? Is that what you’d have me do?”

“Don’t joke with me. …You know exactly what I’m trying to say, don’t you?”

Faced with Noriko’s earnest gaze, Seiroku—rarely so flustered—was visibly at a loss.

“But… I’ve always thought of you as a little sister… someone to cherish—”

2.

Before he could finish speaking, Noriko threw her arms around Seiroku from the front.

“I’m already sixteen… Can you tell I’ve grown since we first met? Not just my body—my heart too.”

As she tightened her embrace, she felt Seiroku’s breath catch.

“I’ve matured. I don’t cry in public anymore. It’s about time you acknowledged that I need you.”

Seiroku’s chest rose and fell gently with each breath—so warm, so tender, like a mother soothing a sleeping child. Noriko buried her face against him, lingering there.

Soon, his hands settled on her shoulders, and slowly, gently, he pulled her away.

“When I get some time off next, I’m thinking of taking Kihachi to the Osaka Exposition. If I leave him at home, Father’ll force him into electrical studies for the rest of his life—he won’t ever be free.”

“…What does that have to do with me? It’s nothing to do with me.”

“You come too. After the Exposition ends, the three of us will run away together.”

She turned his words over and over in her mind. Could this be real? Had she misheard?

“Let’s live together, somewhere far away—the three of us.”

Probably the happiest moment of her life. Noriko threw her arms tightly around Seiroku once more.

“When the date’s set, I’ll send you a letter.”

  

But no letter came, no matter how long she waited. Summer passed, winter arrived in the blink of an eye, and in December, Roku enlisted in the 9th Regiment in Ōtsu.

“There’s still time before enlistment. Why don’t you go see Roku-kun?”

2.

“Let’s run away together.” She turned his words over and over in her mind. Could this be real? Had she misheard? “Let’s live together, somewhere far away—the three of us.” Probably the happiest moment of her life. Noriko threw her arms tightly around Seiroku once more. “When the date’s set, I’ll send you a letter.” But no letter came, no matter how long she waited. Summer passed, winter arrived in the blink of an eye, and in December, Roku enlisted in the 9th Regiment in Ōtsu. “There’s still time before enlistment. Why don’t you go see Roku-kun?”  

So said Jinbei’emon as he lazily puffed on his cigarette—his face unnaturally calm.  

From experience, whenever her father wore that expression, he was almost certainly plotting something.  

Suspicious, Noriko seized the chance while he was out and searched his room. She combed through every corner, and finally, when she opened the bottom drawer of the chest, a single letter slipped out from beneath a stack of documents—and her entire body froze.  

“This… a letter from Seiroku-san?”  

The handwriting on the envelope matched Seiroku’s, but Noriko had never seen this letter before. Why was it hidden here? And why had the seal already been broken?  

With trembling hands, she pulled out the contents and quickly scanned them—then stared in shock.  

“I’ll be waiting for you in front of Dairin Kōtō at the time the *illumināshon* begins—”  

She glared at the specified date, but no matter how she looked at it, it was months in the past. Her head spun, her breath came in ragged gasps, and she collapsed right there onto the floor. She didn’t understand—couldn’t understand.  

But one thing was clear: without her knowing, everything had already spiraled beyond repair.  

“Okaa-san! You hid this letter, didn’t you!”  

When Jinbei’emon returned, Noriko confronted him with a ferocity that chilled the air. But he didn’t flinch—just slowly turned his eyes toward her, exhaled a thin stream of smoke, and said nothing.  

“I merely brushed aside a nuisance insect. You ought to thank me.”  

“…Go die.”  

“What did you say? How dare you speak to your parent like that!”  

“You call *this* being a parent—hiding things with such underhanded tricks?”  

2.

onto the floor. She didn’t understand—couldn’t understand. But one thing was clear: without her knowing, everything had already spiraled beyond repair.

“Okaa-san! You hid this letter, didn’t you!”

When Jinbei’emon returned, Noriko confronted him with a ferocity that chilled the air. But he didn’t flinch—just slowly turned his eyes toward her, exhaled a thin stream of smoke, and said nothing.

“I merely brushed aside a nuisance insect. You ought to thank me.”

“…Go die.”

“What did you say? How dare you speak to your parent like that!”

“You call *this* being a parent—hiding things with such underhanded tricks?”

2.

“Who’s really acting petty, I’d like to know? While engaged to Riku-kun, you’re sneaking around meeting some unknown man behind everyone’s back. What do you plan to do if the Hyakugawa name gets tarnished, hmm? How will you answer for it?”

With those words, Jinbei’emon struck her across the right cheek with a sharp exhale of breath. Clutching her stinging cheek, Noriko glared at him—and then fled the house. They had promised never to go to each other’s homes, but this was no longer a time for such rules.

She took the Keiden line to Shin-Kyōgoku. At Hōrai Butsugu-ten, she asked Bunshichi—without revealing her identity—about Seiroku. “He just left for Ōtsu,” she was told, “to prepare for enlistment.”

She hadn’t expected it would be easy to see him. Yet unable to give up, Noriko headed straight for Seven Roads train station.

By the time she arrived, an upward-bound train was just about to depart. The passenger car doors were already closed. Her heart pounding, she scanned the windows desperately—until at last, her eyes locked onto the face she sought.

“Seiroku-san!”

At the window, Seiroku—who had been resting his chin on his hand—looked up in disbelief, staring at her as if seeing a ghost.

He opened the window and leaned out. “Noriko? Is that you?”

“I’m sorry I couldn’t make it to the fair. My parents hid your letter.”

Seiroku opened and closed his mouth wordlessly, then finally murmured, “I see,” offering a faint, wistful smile.

“Oh—but the *Denki Mokuroku*... Kihachi never got around to finishing it, so I wrote in your *Denki Nishiki* as entry twenty.”

No—that wasn’t why she had given it to him at all.

---

2.

“Seiroku-san!” At the window, Seiroku—who had been resting his chin on his hand—looked up in disbelief, staring at her as if seeing a ghost. He opened the window and leaned out. “Noriko? Is that you?”  

“I’m sorry I couldn’t make it to the fair. My parents hid your letter.”  

Seiroku opened and closed his mouth wordlessly, then finally murmured, “I see,” offering a faint, wistful smile. “Oh—but the *Denki Mokuroku*... Kihachi never got around to finishing it, so I wrote in your *Denki Nishiki* as entry twenty.”  
No—that wasn’t why she had given it to him at all.  

---  

“What do you think of me, Seiroku-san? Am I just some girl you see as a little sister?”  

The moment Noriko cried out, the train began to move with a sluggish lurch, like a giant caterpillar stirring into motion.  

“Don’t follow me. It’s dangerous if you come any further.”  

“I won’t! I’ll cling on no matter what and go with you!”  

Gently prying Noriko’s hands from the window bars, Seiroku smiled broadly, guileless and warm. “Still such a reckless girl as ever.” The train rapidly picked up speed, carrying Seiroku farther and farther away.  

“But y’know—you’re Japan’s greatest beauty.”  

The instant Seiroku pulled his face back inside, a red ribbon tumbled out from within, fluttering freely against the gray backdrop of smoke. Noriko snatched it up and pressed it to her face, her shoulders trembling.  

No tears came. She was past the age where she could cry—even if she wanted to.  

---  

Sitting on the stone steps of Himure Hachiman-gū at the foot of Hachiman-yama, Noriko stroked the cover of the *Denki Mokuroku*.  

“If Riku were to see what’s inside this catalog… it’d be over.”  

Roku knew about the notes for *Denki Nishiki*, but he shouldn’t have any idea about the connection between her and Seiroku.  

Noriko removed the lamp’s glass chimney and brought the open flame close to the *Denki Mokuroku*.  

“Noriko…san?”  

Startled by the sudden voice, Noriko flinched violently.  

At the bottom of the stone steps, Sakamoto Kihachi stood holding a lantern, his gaze fixed dumbfoundedly upon Noriko—and the *Denki Mokuroku* in her hands.  

“What… are you planning to do…?”  

2.

Noriko tightened her lips into a thin line. Kihachi stepped forward cautiously, almost pleadingly.  

“I don’t know what’s happened… but if this disappears, Inako can’t be saved.”  

Noriko ground her teeth. Kihachi inched closer, slowly, deliberately.  

“You care about Inako. About your sister. You must.”  

“No! It’s not like that!”  

The cry tore from Noriko like a scream of pain, and Kihachi froze.  

“I’ve always hated Inako. Ever since we were kids. She’s too naive—believes everything people say, keeps failing, yet keeps trying anyway… I’ve always despised her for it.”  

*It’s a lie*, her heart ached. Inako was her beloved sister. The only one left in this world she could still call her anchor.  

“But even though she’s so dull-witted, someone’s always looking out for her. Okaa-san, Roku-san, you, Kihachi-san… everyone needs her. Her sincerity, her purity, the way she draws people to her—she’s even got Okaa-san’s love. Inako has everything I don’t… everything! It’s always just Inako!”  

“Noriko-san…”  

“I’ve always been alone! Even Seiroku—someone I trusted—didn’t need me!”  

The moment the words slipped out, Kihachi’s eyes widened in sudden understanding.  

“That red ribbon… I’ve always felt I’d seen it somewhere before. It was tied around the biscuit tin my brother bought me at the fair.”  

2.

“…Yes, it was a gift from Seiroku-san. I wanted to be with Seiroku-san. When the war ended, I steeled myself—I resolved to marry Roku-san for the sake of the family. But then Roku-san suddenly changed, acting unnaturally cold and distant. Postponing the wedding, always worrying about others instead of me… Does he think I don’t matter at all?”

“…Of course he does. After all, I’ve been betraying him all along. Now I’m complaining like some spoiled child. But I can’t let Roku-san find out about my relationship with Seiroku-san. If he discovers it and rejects me… I’ll be completely alone.”

At Kihachi’s look of quiet relief, Noriko let out a small, deflated “Huh?”

“You’ve always wanted someone to lean on, haven’t you, Noriko-san?”

She had no reply. Noriko bit down hard on her lower lip.

“Yes. I’m just a child throwing a tantrum. But I don’t ever want to be alone again!”

Resolved, she lowered *Denki Mokuroku* toward the flame.

But just before the fire touched it, a large hand reached out from behind and slapped the lamp’s wick, snuffing it out.

Darkness fell. Someone snatched *Denki Mokuroku* from her grasp.

Before she could react, Kihachi came rushing over with the lamp—its light revealing Roku standing behind Noriko.

“I finally found you,” Roku exhaled, *Denki Mokuroku* clenched in his hand.

“I can’t let you burn this. It’s the last memento of my dearest friend.”

As Noriko stood frozen, Roku’s face twisted in pain.

“It was I who gave *Denki Mokuroku* to Stuart-san. I… I know.”

“Know what?”

2.

The flame flickered, about to ignite the paper. But just before it touched, a large hand shot out from behind and slapped the wick of the lamp, extinguishing it. Darkness fell. Someone snatched *Denki Mokuroku* from her grasp. Before she could react, Kihachi came rushing over with the lantern—its light revealing Roku standing behind Noriko.

“I’ve finally found you,” Roku exhaled, *Denki Mokuroku* clenched tightly in his hand. “I can’t let you burn this. It’s the last memento of my dearest friend.” As Noriko stood frozen, Roku’s face twisted in anguish. “It was I who gave *Denki Mokuroku* to Stuart-san. I… I know.”

“Know what?”

“You and Seiroku—I know about your relationship.”

Noriko, like a puppet whose strings had been cut, crumpled to the ground.

“…Did you serve with my brother in the war, Roku-san?” Kihachi asked quietly.

“All along. From the day we met at school, until the fortress at Nanzen where he died.”

“You… you witnessed my brother’s final moments?”

Roku lowered his eyes. After a long silence, he slowly nodded.

